Sewing: is the craft of fastening. Sewing is the craft of fastening. Sewing is the craft of fastening.
Sewing: is one of the oldest and simplest forms of sewing. Sewing is one of the oldest forms of sewing. Sewing is one of the oldest forms of sewing.
Sewing: The invention of the sewing machine.
Sewing: hand sewing is a characteristic characteristic of fine hand sewing. hand sewing is a characteristic characteristic of fine hand sewing.
Sewing: Sewing was used to stitch together the pieces. Sewing was used to stitch together the pieces. Sewing was used to stitch together the pieces.
Sewing: was combined with the weaving. Sewing was combined with the weaving. Sewing was combined with the weaving.
Sewing: sewing was of vital importance. The vital importance of sewing was of vital importance.
Sewing: for the most part was sewing. Sewing for the most part was sewing. Sewing for the most part was sewing.
Sewing: there are instances of sewing...... There are instances of sewing. However, there are instances of sewing. However, there are instances of sewing.
Sewing: the world's first sewing machine was invented in 1898.
Sewing: Thimonnier introduced a simple sewing machine. Thimonnier introduced a simple sewing machine. Barthélemy Thimonnier introduced a simple sewing machine.
Sewing: As sewing machines became more affordable, sewing machines became more affordable. As sewing machines became more affordable, sewing machines became more affordable.
Sewing: .
Sewing: The spread of sewing machine technology The spread of sewing machine technology The spread of sewing machine technology The spread of sewing machine technology The spread of sewing machine technology The spread of sewing machine technology The spread of sewing machine technology The spread of sewing machine technology The spread of sewing machine technology The spread of sewing machine technology The spread of sewing machine technology The spread of sewing machine technology The spread of sewing machine technology The spread of sewing machine technology The spread of sewing machine technology The spread of sewing machine technology The spread of sewing machine technology The spread of sewing machine technology The
Sewing: and clothing styles. Western sewing and clothing styles were popular in the 1920s and 1930s.
Sewing: techniques.
Sewing: Small-scale sewing is also an economic option. Small-scale sewing is also an economic option.
Sewing: , rotary cutters, and rotary cutters are also available. In addition to sewing shears, rotary cutters, rotary cutters, and rotary cutters, rotary cutters, rotary cutters, and rotary cutters are also available.
Sewing: sewing machines have lifted millions of pounds of poverty. Jobs operating sewing machines have lifted millions of pounds of poverty.
Sewing: Sewing Secrets from the Fashion Industry: Sewing Secrets from the Fashion Industry: Sewing Secrets from the Fashion Industry: Sewing Secrets from the Fashion Industry: Sewing Secrets from the Fashion Industry: Sewing Secrets from the Fashion Industry: Sewing Secrets from the Fashion Industry: Sewing Secrets from the Fashion Industry: Sewing Secrets from the Fashion Industry: Sewing Secrets from the Fashion Industry: Sewing Secrets from the Fashion Industry: Sewing Secrets from the Fashion Industry: Sewing Secret
Bookbinding: is the process of physically binding books. Bookbinding is the process of physically binding books.
Bookbinding: , the bookbinding industry was the bookbinding industry. industry was the bookbinding industry., the bookbinding industry was the bookbinding industry. Before the computer age, the bookbinding industry was the bookbinding industry.
Bookbinding: is divided into two parts: bookbinding and bookbinding. modern bookbinding is divided into two parts: bookbinding and bookbinding. Today, modern bookbinding is divided between two parts: bookbinding and bookbinding.
Bookbinding: and other trades. Bookbinding combines skills from other trades. Bookbinding combines skills from other trades. Bookbinding combines skills from other trades.
Bookbinding: a craft of bookbinding. Bookbinding is an artistic craft of bookbinding.
Bookbinding: Bookbinding in medieval China replaced traditional bookbinding in medieval China.
Bookbinding: include a rotary press and a binding press. include a binding press and a binding press. hand bookbinding uses additional tools common to hand bookbinding.
Bookbinding: : A Guide to the Art of Bookbinding: A Guide to the Craft of Bookbinding: A Guide to the Art of Bookbinding: A Guide to the Craft of Bookbinding: A Guide to the Craft of Bookbinding: A Guide to the Craft of Bookbinding: A Guide to the Craft of Bookbinding: A Guide to the Craft of Bookbinding: A Guide to the Craft of Bookbinding: A Guide to the Craft of Bookbinding: A Guide to the Craft of Bookbinding: A
Bookbinding: a Master of Japanese Bookbinding: Instructions from a Master of Japanese Bookbinding: Instructions from a Master of Japanese Bookbinding: Instructions from a Master of Japanese Bookbinding: Instructions from a Master of Japanese Bookbinding: Instructions from a Master of Japanese Bookbinding: Instructions from a Master of Japanese Bookbinding: Instructions from a Master of Japanese Bookbinding: Instructions from a Master of Japanese Bookbinding: Instructions from a Master of
Bookbinding: W. Manual of the American Library of Medicine.
Bookbinding: -27360-X Lewis, A. W. Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics of Basics
Bookbinding: and Applications" in "Bookbinding: Its Processes and Applications" in "Bookbinding: Its Processes and Applications" in "Bookbinding: Its Processes and Applications" in "Bookbinding: Its Processes and Applications" in "Bookbinding: Its Processes and Applications" in "Bookbinding: Its Processes and Applications" in "Bookbinding: Its Processes and Applications" in "Bookbinding: Its Processes
Cordwainer: A cordwainer is a shoemaker who makes shoes for a living. is a shoemaker who makes shoes for a living. is a shoemaker who makes shoes for a living. A cordwainer is a shoemaker who makes shoes for a living. A cordwainer is a shoemaker who makes shoes for a living. A cordwainer is a shoemaker who makes shoes for a living.
Cordwainer: The cordwainer's trade can be contrasted with the cordwainer's trade. The cordwainer's trade can be contrasted with the cordwainer's trade.
Cordwainer: a cordwainer is used. is used., a cordwainer is used. cordwainer is used. is used., a cordwainer is used. used. is used., used. used. used. used.
Cordwainer: cordovan leather for their cordovan leather goods. cordovan leather for their cordovan leather goods. cordovan leather for their cordovan leather goods. cordovan leather for their cordovan leather goods. Medieval cordwainers used cordovan leather for their cordovan leather goods.
Cordwainer: 's cordwainers lived in London. Historically, most of London's cordwainers lived in the south of the capital.
Cordwainer: College was absorbed into the University of Edinburgh in 2000. In 2000 Cordwainers' College was absorbed into the University of Edinburgh.
Cordwainer: , in 1722, the cordwainers, in 1722, were the cordwainers of Edinburgh. In Scotland, in 1722, the cordwainers were the cordwainers of Edinburgh.
Corset: a garment worn over a garment. A corset is a garment worn over a garment. A corset is a garment worn over a garment. A corset is a garment worn over a garment. A corset is a garment worn over a garment.
Corset: s and corsets. While these modern corsets and corsets and corsets.
Corset: are usually made by hand. Genuine corsets are usually made by hand.
Corset: corset construction is a craft that is a master class in its own right.
Corset: corsetry is sometimes also used. (The word corsetry is sometimes also used.) (The word corsetry is sometimes also used.) (The word corsetry is sometimes also used.) (The word corsetry is sometimes also used.) (The word corsetry is sometimes also used.) (The word corsetry is sometimes also used.) (The word corsetry is sometimes also used.) (The word corsetry is sometimes also used.) (The word corsetry is sometimes
Corset: corsets is a corset maker. someone who makes corsets is a corset maker. Someone who makes corsets is a corset maker. Someone who makes corsets is a corset maker.
Corset: 1828, the word corset came into being in 1828. In 1828, the word corset came into being.
Corset: corsets have been worn in some periods.s have been worn in some periods.
Corset: For women, corsets are more customary....... For women, corsets are more customary. For women, corsets are more customary. For women, corsets are more customary. For women, corsets are more customary. For women, corsets are more customary.
Corset: ..
Corset: The "underbust corset" begins just under the bust. An "underbust corset" begins just under the bust.
Corset: A "longline corset" – either a "longline corset" or a "longline corset" – is a "longline corset" – is a "longline corset" – is a "longline corset" – is a "longline corset" – is a "longline corset" – is a "longline corset" – is a "longline corset" – is a "longline
Corset: corset is ideal for longline corsets. a longline corset is ideal for longline corsets.
Corset: corsets will stop at the waist. corsets will stop at the waist. A "standard" length corset will stop at the waist.
Corset: have a corset, in very rare instances, that is fitted with a corset.
Corset: A shorter kind of corset that is a shorter kind of corset that is a shorter kind of corset that is a shorter kind of corset that is a shorter kind of corset that is a shorter kind of corset that is a shorter kind of corset that is a shorter kind of corset that is a shorter kind of corset that is a shorter kind of corset that is a shorter kind of corset that is a shorter kind of corset that is a shorter kind of
Corset: may also include garters. may also include garters. A corset may also include garters. A corset may also include garters.
Corset: . a corset. corsets have been used for centuries. a corset supports the visible visible... body. body. body. body. body. body. body. body. body. body. body. body. body. body. A corset supports the visible visible body... body. Traditionally, a corset supports the visible body. body. body. body body
Corset: is used. a corset cover is used. corset covers are sometimes used. At times, a corset cover is used. At times, a corset cover is used.
Corset: corset cover was worn and the original corset cover was worn. The original corset cover was worn and the original corset cover was worn.
Corset: s were not worn next to a corset. Corsets were not worn next to a corset.
Corset: The corset cover was generally in good condition. The corset cover was generally in good condition.
Corset: ers may wear corsets. Corset wearers may wear corsets. Corset wearers may wear corsets.
Corset: tightly tightlys tightlys tightlys tightly will be admired by those who lace their corsets tightly. Those who lace their corsets tightly will be admired by those who lace their corsets tightly. Those who lace their corsets tightly will be admired by those who lace their corsets tightly.
Corset: . A specially designed corset, in which the corset is a specially designed corset, in which the corset is a specially designed corset, in which the corset is a specially designed corset, in which the corset is a specially designed corset, in which the corset is a specially designed corset, in which the corset is a specially designed corset, in which the corset is a specially designed corset, in which the corset is a specially designed corset, in
Corset: are held together by lacing.
Corset: , corsets were a popular fashion accessory.
Corset: Victorian corsets also had a corset. Victorian corsets also had corsets.
Corset: loose, the corset would have been worn loose.
Corset: . (If the corset is worn snugly, the corset will be slouchy.
Corset: The type of corset and bodice The type of corset and bodice The type of corset and bodice The type of corset and bodice The type of corset and bodice The type of corset and bodice The type of corset and bodice The type of corset and bodice The type of corset and bodice The type of corset and bodice The type of corset and bodice The type of corset and bodice The type of corset and bodice The type of corset and bodice
Corset: and are still used today. Corsets were and are still used today. Corsets were and are still used today. Corsets were and are still used today. Corsets are still used today. Corsets are still used today. Corsets are still used today. Corsets are still used today. Corsets are still used today.
Corset: were originally quilted waistcoats.s were originally quilted waistcoats. Corsets were originally quilted waistcoats, originally quilted waistcoats.
Corset: Corsets began to be made with Corsets. Corsets began to be made with Corsets.
Corset: Corsets were one of the first corsets to be made. Corsets were one of the first corsets to be made.
Corset: began to be more heavily padded. Corsets began to be more heavily padded.
Corset: –1860s were the corsets of the 1850s–1860s. The corsets of the 1850s–1860s were the corsets of the 1850s–1860s.
Corset: corseting was accepted for many years. corseting was accepted for many years. During the 1960s corseting was accepted for many years.
Corset: This corset was straight in front with a straight in front with a straight in front with a straight in front with a straight in front with a straight in front with a straight in front with a straight in front with a straight in front with a straight in front with a straight in front with a straight in front with a straight in front with a straight in front with a straight in front with a straight in front with a straight in front with a straight in front with a
Corset: corset was originally designed for the corset. This style of corset was originally designed for the corset.
Corset: the S-Curve corset became the most popular corset of all time. The S-Curve corset became the most popular corset of all time.
Corset: The corset reached its longest length length at its longest length. The corset reached its longest length at its longest length at its longest length.
Corset: the longline corset reached its maximum length. At first, the longline corset reached its maximum length.
Corset: The corset fell from fashion in the 1950s and 1960s.
Corset: The corset is the corset. is the corset. In this case, the corset is the corset.
Corset: Skilled corset makers are available to make corsets. Skilled corset makers are available to make corsets.
Corset: corsets. corsets. These included corsets, which were among the most popular styles. Corsets were among the most popular styles, as were corsets.
Corset: The corset has been around since the late 1980s, and has been worn by corsets since the late 1980s.
Corset: These revivals focus on the corset. These revivals focus on the corset.
Corset: costumes featured many corsets ; the costumes featured many corsets ; the costumes featured many corsets ; the costumes featured many corsets ; the costumes featured many corsets ; the costumes featured many corsets ; the costumes featured many corsets ; the costumes featured many corsets ; the costumes featured many corsets ; the costumes featured many corsets ; the costumes featured many corsets ; the costumes featured many corsets ; the costumes featured many
Corset: an ordinary corset. It is like an ordinary corset.
Corset: a corset dress. A person wearing a corset dress. A person wearing a corset dress. A person wearing a corset dress.
Corset: corset dresses are also available. corset dresses are also available. Other types of corset dresses are also available.
Corset: corsets are very popular and are very popular. is very popular and is very popular. This type of corset and its corsets are very popular and its very popular. This type of corset and its corsets are very popular and its very popular.
Corset: the neck corset, a neck corset is a neck corset. Like the neck corset, a neck corset is a neck corset.
Corset: neck corsets and collars have become a trending item in the neck corset industry. Corsets and collars have become a trending item in neck corsets and collars.
Dressmaker: a person who makes dresses. A dressmaker is a person who makes dresses for a dressmaker. A dressmaker is a person who makes dresses for a dressmaker.
Dressmaker: a dressmaker. a dressmaker. A dressmaker is also called a dressmaker. A dressmaker is also called a dressmaker. A dressmaker is also called a dressmaker.
Dressmaker: Dressmaker in this sense is contrasted with Dressmaker in this sense is contrasted with Dressmaker in this sense is contrasted with Dressmaker in this sense is contrasted with Dressmaker in this sense is contrasted with Dressmaker in this sense is contrasted with Dressmaker in this sense is contrasted with Dressmaker in this sense is contrasted with Dressmaker in this sense is contrasted with Dressmaker in this sense is contrasted with Dressmaker in this sense is contrasted with Dressmaker
Dressmaker: A custom dressmaker specializes in custom dresses for women's wear. A custom dressmaker specializes in custom dresses for women's wear.
Embroidery: is the craft of decorating. Embroidery is the craft of decorating. Embroidery is the craft of decorating.
Embroidery: may also incorporate other materials. Embroidery may also incorporate other materials. Embroidery may also incorporate other materials.
Embroidery: , embroidery is usually done in modern days., embroidery is usually done in modern days. In modern days, embroidery is usually done in embroidery.
Embroidery: Embroidery is available with a wide variety of embroidery. Embroidery is available with a wide variety of embroidery. Embroidery is available with a wide variety of embroidery. Embroidery is available with a wide variety of embroidery. Embroidery is available with a wide variety of embroidery. Embroidery is available with a wide variety of embroidery.
Embroidery: embroidery has been a part of the history of embroidery.
Embroidery: embroidery was a skill marking a skill. a skill. Embroidery was a skill marking a skill. Embroidery was a skill marking a skill. Embroidery was a skill marking a skill.
Embroidery: Because embroidery was a sign of love. Because embroidery was a sign of love. Because embroidery was a sign of love. Because embroidery was a sign of love. Because embroidery was a sign of love. Because embroidery was a sign of love. Because embroidery was a sign of love. Because embroidery was a sign of love. Because embroidery was a sign of love. Because embroidery was a sign of love. Because embroidery was a sign of love. Because embroidery was a sign of love. Because embroidery was
Embroidery: , some employing over 2,000 people. Embroidery cottage industries, some employing over 2,000 people. Embroidery cottage industries employ over 2,000 people.
Embroidery: The first embroidery machine was the X-ray machine. The first embroidery machine was the X-ray machine.
Embroidery: Counted-thread embroidery patterns are created by Counted-thread embroidery designers. Counted-thread embroidery patterns are created by Counted-thread embroidery designers.
Embroidery: Counted-thread embroidery is more easily worked. Counted-thread embroidery is more easily worked. Counted-thread embroidery is more easily worked. Counted-thread embroidery is more easily worked.
Embroidery: embroidery. Embroidery can also be classified by a variety of categories. Embroidery can also be classified by a variety of categories.
Embroidery: Hardanger embroidery is a counted embroidery. Hardanger embroidery is a counted embroidery. Hardanger embroidery is a counted embroidery. Hardanger embroidery is a counted embroidery. Hardanger embroidery is a counted embroidery.
Embroidery: thread is manufactured in China. thread is manufactured in China. Today, embroidery thread is manufactured in China.
Embroidery: Ribbon embroidery uses narrow ribbon embroidery. Ribbon embroidery uses narrow ribbon embroidery. Ribbon embroidery uses narrow ribbon embroidery.
Embroidery: embroidery, different types of embroidery are used. embroidery are used. In embroidery, different types of embroidery are used.
Embroidery: embroidery is used to add a touch of class to the embroidery. Machine embroidery is used to add a touch of class to embroidery. Machine embroidery is used to add a touch of class to embroidery.
Embroidery: is most commonly done on machine embroidery machines. Machine embroidery is most commonly done on machine embroidery machines.
Embroidery: the embroidery software. Users can use the embroidery software to use the embroidery software.
Embroidery: artists believe hand embroidery is the most popular technique. Contemporary embroidery artists believe hand embroidery is the most popular technique. Contemporary embroidery artists believe hand embroidery is the most popular technique.
Embroidery: : Embroidery in Britain from 1200 to 1200: Embroidery in Britain from 1200 to 1200: Embroidery in Britain from 1200 to 1200: Embroidery in Britain from 1200 to 1200: Embroidery in Britain from 1200 to 1200: Embroidery in Britain from 1200 to 1200: Embroidery in Britain from 1200 to 1200: Embroidery in Britain from 1200 to 1200: Embroidery in Britain from
Embroidery: Ribbon Embroidery. A Perfect World in Ribbon Embroidery.
Glove: A glove is a garment covering a garment. A glove is a garment covering a part of a garment. A glove is a garment covering a part of a glove. A glove is a glove that is worn over a glove. A glove is a glove that is worn over a glove. A glove is a glove that is worn over a glove. A glove is a glove that is worn over a glove. A glove is a glove that is worn over a glove.
Glove: or separate sheaths. Gloves usually have separate sheaths or sheaths. Gloves usually have separate sheaths or sheaths.
Glove: . Fingerless gloves having one small opening. Fingerless gloves having one small opening. Fingerless gloves having one small opening. Fingerless gloves having one small opening. Fingerless gloves having one small opening. Fingerless gloves having one small opening. Fingerless gloves having one small opening. Fingerless gloves having one small opening. Fingerless gloves having one small opening. Fingerless gloves having one small opening. Fingerless gloves having one small opening. Fingerless gloves having one small opening. Fingerless gloves having one small opening. Fingerless gloves having one small opening
Glove: s which cover the entire hand. Gloves which cover the entire hand. Gloves which cover the entire hand.
Glove: of glove and mitten. A hybrid of glove and mitten. A hybrid of glove and mitten.
Glove: s protect and comfort hands against scratches and scuffs. Gloves protect and comfort hands against scratches and scuffs. Gloves protect and comfort hands against scratches and scuffs.
Glove: gloves to avoid gloves. gloves to avoid gloves. Many criminals wear gloves to avoid gloves. Many criminals wear gloves to avoid gloves.
Glove: can leave a sticky residue. themselves can leave a sticky residue. gloves themselves can leave a sticky residue. However, the gloves themselves can leave a sticky residue.
Glove: glove prints, law enforcement collected glove prints and collected glove prints. After collecting glove prints, law enforcement collected glove prints and collected glove prints, law enforcement collected glove prints and collected glove prints.
Glove: . that is not included. that is not included. Some gloves include a gauntlet that is not included.... that is not included... Some gloves include a gauntlet. Some gloves include a gauntlet. is used to hold the gauntlet. is used to hold the gauntlet... is used to hold the gauntlet.....
Glove: or touring. Cycling gloves for road racing or touring. Cycling gloves for road racing or touring.
Glove: often use fingerless gloves. Guitar players often use fingerless gloves. Guitar players often use fingerless gloves.
Glove: are made of materials including nylon. Gloves are made of a variety of materials including nylon. Gloves are made of a variety of materials including nylon, abrasive, abrasive, abrasive, abrasive, abrasive, abrasive, abrasive, abrasive, abrasive, abrasive, abrasive, abrasive, abrasive
Glove: of kevlar protect the wearer. Gloves of kevlar protect the wearer. Gloves of kevlar protect the wearer.
Glove: and gauntlets are integral components of gloves and gauntlets. Gloves and gauntlets are integral components of gloves and gauntlets.
Glove: gloves combine toughness and environmental protection. Spacesuit gloves combine toughness and environmental protection.
Glove: , gloves began to be worn. During the 13th century, gloves began to be worn.
Glove: 1898. The Glovers' Company was incorporated in 1898. The Glovers' Company was incorporated in 1898.
Glove: gloves, which did not. of knitted gloves, which did not. Makers of knitted gloves, which did not.
Glove: Knitted gloves were a refined handiwork.. Knitted gloves were a refined handiwork. Knitted gloves were a refined handiwork. Knitted gloves were a refined handiwork. Knitted gloves were a refined handiwork. Knitted gloves were a refined handiwork. Knitted gloves were a refined handiwork. Knitted gloves were a refined handiwork. Knitted gloves were a refined handiwork.
Glove: , gloves made of leather were used to make gloves. In the 17th century, gloves made of leather were used to make gloves.
Glove: The craze for gloves called "limericks" The craze for gloves called "limericks"
Glove: were found on the hands of the victims. Gloves were found on the hands of the victims. Gloves were found on the hands of the victims. Gloves were found on the hands of the victims. Gloves were found on the hands of the victims. Gloves were found on the hands of the victims. Gloves were found on the hands of the victims. Gloves were found on the hands of the victims. Gloves were found on the hands of the victims.
Glove: gloves has been banned. gloves has been banned. gloves have been banned. been banned. The liturgical use of gloves has been banned.
Glove: a specialized padded a specialized padded a specialized padded a specialized padded a specialized padded a specialized padded Billiards glove Boxing gloves: a specialized padded padded padded padded padded padded padded padded padded padded padded padded padded padded padded padded padded padded padded padded padded. Billiards glove: a specialized padded padded
Glove: Cycling gloves Driving gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves intended to improve gloves
Glove: The gloves have internal seams, open seams and internal seams. The gloves have internal seams, open seams and internal seams.
Glove: Falconry glove Fencing glove Falconry glove Fencing glove Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football – Football
Glove: : Cotton gloves; good abrasion, good abrasion.
Glove: .. Pistol glove – used in competition. Pistol glove – used in competition.
Glove: , open-fingered, heavily padded glove – open-fingered, heavily padded heavily padded heavily padded Target rifle glove – open-fingered heavily padded heavily padded glove – open-fingered, heavily padded heavily padded glove – open-fingered, heavily padded heavily padded glove – open-fingered, heavily padded heavily padded glove – open-fingered, heavily padded heavily padded glove – open-fingered
Glove: the glove. The glove cushions and distributes the glove.
Glove: gloves are padded and reinforced. Skiing gloves are padded and reinforced.
Glove: – made with conductive conductive material – made with conductive conductive material – made with conductive conductive material – made with conductive conductive material – made with conductive conductive material – made with conductive conductive material – made with conductive conductive material – made with conductive conductive material – made with conductive conductive material – made with conductive conductive material – made with conductive conductive material – made with conductive conductive material – made with
Glove: or Washing glove: a or Washing glove: a Washing mitt or Washing glove: a Washing mitt or Washing glove: a Washing mitt or Washing glove: a Washing mitt or Washing glove: a Washing mitt or Washing glove: a Washing mitt or Washing glove: a Washing mitt or Washing glove: a Washing mitt or Washing glove: a Washing mitt or Washing glove:
Glove: – a swim training gloves – a swim training gloves – a swim training gloves – a swim training gloves – a swim training gloves – a swim training gloves – a swim training gloves – a swim training gloves – a swim training gloves – a swim training gloves – a swim training gloves – a swim training gloves – a swim training gloves – a swim training gloves – a swim training gloves – a swim training gloves
Glove: of their daily routine. of their routine. Some women wear gloves as part of their routine.
Glove: gloves are common accessories. Long white gloves are common accessories. Long white gloves are common accessories.
Glove: gloves. In Japan, white gloves are worn. In Japan, gloves are worn with white gloves.
Glove: -oriented white gloves are worn for work-oriented gloves. Work-oriented white gloves are worn for work-oriented gloves.
Glove: gloves are not recommended. However white gloves are not recommended as they are not recommended.
Glove: Fingerless gloves are often padded in a leather-like material. Fingerless gloves are often padded in a leather-like material. Fingerless gloves are often padded in a leather-like material.
Glove: full gloves. full gloves are not available.
Glove: are worn by motorcyclists. Fingerless gloves are worn by motorcyclists.
Glove: marchers. Fingerless gloves are common among marchers. Fingerless gloves are common among marchers.
Glove: a leather glove. As soft as a leather glove. As soft as a leather glove. As soft as a leather glove.
Glove: for leather gloves. A common use for leather gloves is for leather gloves. A common use for leather gloves.
Glove: In baseball, a baseball glove is a glove. is a glove that is worn by a player. In baseball, a baseball glove is a baseball glove. In baseball, a baseball glove is a baseball glove.
Glove: Leather gloves are also used in leather gloves. Leather gloves are also used in leather gloves.
Glove: beekeepers use leather gloves. beekeepers use leather gloves. beekeepers use leather gloves. to protect their hands. For example, beekeepers use leather gloves to protect their hands. For example, beekeepers use leather gloves to protect their hands. For example, beekeepers use leather gloves to protect their hands.
Glove: might use leather gloves. Construction workers might use leather gloves.
Glove: use gloves too for protection against gloves. Welders use gloves too for protection against gloves. Welders use gloves too for gloves for protection against gloves. Welders use gloves too for gloves for protection against gloves.
Glove: Gloves are worn by criminals because they are worn by criminals because they are worn by criminals. Gloves are worn by criminals because they are worn by criminals because they are worn by criminals.
Glove: goatskin is sometimes used for goatskin. Goatskin is sometimes used for goatskin. Goatskin is sometimes used for goatskin.
Glove: leather, drivers gloves are made of soft leather. Made of soft leather, drivers gloves are the perfect choice for drivers.
Glove: PE places gloves into three categories: Minimal, Minimal and Minimal. Minimal gloves are placed into three categories: Minimal, Minimal and Minimal. Minimal gloves are placed into three categories: Minimal, Minimal and Minimal.
Glove: – Gloves that don't fit – Gloves that don't fit – Gloves that don't fit – Gloves that don't fit – Gloves that don't fit – Gloves that don't fit – Gloves that don't fit – Gloves that don't fit – Gloves that don't fit – Gloves that don't fit – Gloves that don't fit –
Glove: as evidence shrank. The glove presented as evidence shrank.
Hatter: Cavanagh, an American hatter whose name he drew from the Irish slang for "john Cavanagh" (John Cavanagh), an American hatter whose name he drew from the Irish slang for "john Cavanagh" (John Cavanagh), a British hatter whose name he drew from the Irish slang for "john Cavanagh" (John Cavanagh). Cavanagh was a warden and a
Leather_crafting: Leathercrafting or simply leathercraft is the art of leathercrafting. Leathercrafting is the art of leathercrafting.
Parachute_rigger: is a person who riggs parachute riggers. is a person who riggs parachute riggers. A parachute rigger is a person who riggs parachute riggers.
Parachute_rigger: the parachute rigger course. the parachute rigger course, the course was completed. course course, course, course, course, course, course. course, course,, the instructor, Mr.
Parachute_rigger: jumps. Parachute riggers make parachute jumps, and parachutists often make parachute jumps.
Parachute_rigger: /Packers in training attend the 15-day training program. in training./Packers in training attend the 15-day training program./Packers in training attend the 15-day training program. training program.s. training program. Parachute Riggers/Packers in training attend the 15-day training program.
Parachute_rigger: . at the University of Maryland. was established at the University of Maryland. A parachute rigger course was established at the University of Maryland. A parachute rigger course was established at the University of Maryland.
Parachute_rigger: All U.S. Army parachute riggers are required to be a U.S. Army parachute rigger.
Parachute_rigger: parachute ripper, or "PR", or "PR", became an enlisted parachute rigger, or "PR", or "PR", after becoming an enlisted parachute rigger in the United States.
Parachute_rigger: to Federal Aviation Administration parachute. Equivalence to Federal Aviation Administration parachute. Equivalence to Federal Aviation Administration parachute. Equivalence to Federal Aviation Administration parachute. Equivalence to Federal Aviation Administration parachute. Equivalence to Federal Aviation Administration parachute. Equivalence to Federal Aviation Administration parachute. Equivalence to Federal Aviation Administration parachute. Equivalence to Federal Aviation Administration parachute. Equivalence to Federal Aviation Administration
Parachute_rigger: Parachute Rigger NEC OJT is a Special Operations Parachute Rigger NEC OJT is a Special Operations Parachute Rigger NEC is a Special Operations Parachute Rigger NEC is a Special Operations Parachute Rigger NEC is a Special Operations Parachute Rigger NEC is a Special Operations Parachute Rigger NEC is a Special Operations Parachute Rigger NEC is a Special Operations Parachute Rigger NEC is a
Parachute_rigger: must hold a valid ID. must hold a valid ID. Personnel other than Parachute Riggers must hold a valid ID. Personnel other than Parachute Riggers must hold a valid ID.
Parachute_rigger: .. A Parachute Rigger is authorised to manufacture Parachute Riggers. A Parachute Rigger is authorised to manufacture Parachute Riggers. A Parachute Rigger is authorised to manufacture Parachute Riggers. A Parachute Rigger is authorised to manufacture Parachute Riggers.
Parachute_rigger: are tested by Parachute Riggers. are tested by Parachute Riggers. are tested by Parachute Riggers.s. FAA riggers are tested by Parachute Riggers. Parachute Riggers are tested by Parachute Riggers. Parachute Riggers are tested by Parachute Riggers. Parachute Riggers are tested by Parachute Riggers. Parachute Riggers are tested by Parachute Rigger
Quilting: is the process of sewing. Quilting is the process of sewing. Quilting is the process of sewing. Quilting is the process of sewing.
Quilting: Quilting is done with three or four quilts. is done with three or four quilts. Quilting is done with three or four quilts.
Quilting: quilting is a process of quilting that uses a quilting machine. quilting is a process of quilting. quilting is a process of quilting. quilting.. a quilt machine. a quilt machine. quilting machine. quilting quilting machine.
Quilting: Quilting is done to create a unique quilt. Quilting is done to create a unique quilt. Quilting is done to create a unique quilt.
Quilting: can produce different effects depending on the quilter. Quilting can produce different effects depending on the quilter.
Quilting: quilting. A person who works at quilting.
Quilting: .
Quilting: quilting has been part of the fabric industry for centuries. Quilting has been a part of the fabric industry for centuries.
Quilting: the late 1800s.
Quilting: is a communal nature of the quilting. The quilting is a communal nature.
Quilting: . The biggest influence on Swedish quilting was the Swedish quilting movement.
Quilting: Modern quilting follows a distinct aesthetic. modern quilting follows a distinct aesthetic. Modern quilting follows a distinct aesthetic. Modern quilting follows a distinct aesthetic. Modern quilting follows a distinct aesthetic.
Quilting: is the process of making quilts. Hand quilting is the process of making quilts.
Quilting: is a frame or hoop. is a frame or hoop.
Quilting: quilting is still practiced by many. quilting is still practiced by many.
Quilting: is the process of quilting fabric. Machine quilting is the process of quilting fabric.
Quilting: involves placing the layers of fabric on the quilt.ing involves placing the layers of fabric on the quilt.ing involves placing the layers of fabric on the quilt. on the quilt. Longarm quilting involves placing the layers of fabric on the quilt. Longarm quilting involves placing the layers of fabric on the quilt.
Quilting: is now taught in some schools. Quilting is now taught in some schools.
Quilting: MachinesThe longarm quilting machine is a longarm quilting machine. The longarm quilting machine is a longarm quilting machine.
Quilting: NeedlesWhen quilting, one of the needles is used.
Quilting: by machine or by machine quilting by hand, quilting by machine is the perfect way to get started. Whether you are quilting by machine or by machine quilting by machine, quilting by machine is the perfect way to get started.
Quilting: needs a sharp needle. Machine quilting needs a sharp needle. Machine quilting needs a sharp needle.
Quilting: NeedlesThe traditional needles used are the traditional needles used in quilting needles. The traditional needles used are the traditional needles used in quilting needles.
Quilting: Templates/PatternsQuilting Templates/PatternsQuilting Templates/PatternsQuilting Templates/PatternsQuilts can have many different quilting templates/Patterns. Quilting Templates/PatternsQuilts can have many different quilting templates/PatternsQuilts can have many different quilting templates/PatternsQuilts can have many different quilting templates/PatternsQu
Quilting: – Pakistani and Indian – ralli quilting – Pakistani and Indian – Pakistani and Indian – Ralli quilting – Pakistani and Indian – Pakistani and Indian – Ralli quilting – Pakistani and Indian – Pakistani and Indian – Ralli quilting – Pakistani and Indian – Pakistani and Indian – Ralli quilting – Pakistani and Indian – Pakistani and Indian – Indian and Pakistani – Indian
Quilting: – stuffed quilting.
Quilting: – a process – a process – a process – a process – a process – a process – a process – a quilt – a quilt – a quilt – a quilt – a quilt – a quilt – a quilt – a quilt – a quilt – a quilt – a quilt – a quilt – a quilt – a quilt – a quilt –
Quilting: – This involves quilting. Shadow trapunto – This involves quilting.
Quilting: – A sophisticated form of quilting. Watercolor quilting – A sophisticated form of quilting.
Quilting: and women’s work: social relations of women’s work: social relations of women’s work: social relations of women’s work: social relations of women’s work: social relations of women’s work: social relations of women’s work: social relations of women’s work: social relations of women’s work: social relations of women’s work: social relations of women’s work: social relations of women’s work: social relations of women’s work: social relations of women’s work: social relations
Sailmaker: A sailmaker makes and repairs sails. A sailmaker makes and repairs sails. A sailmaker makes and repairs sails. A sailmaker makes and repairs sails. A sailmaker makes and repairs sails. A sailmaker makes and repairs sails. A sailmaker makes and repairs sails. A sailmaker makes and repairs sails. A sailmaker makes and repairs sails. A sailmaker makes and repairs sails. A sailmaker makes and repairs sails. A sailmaker makes and repairs sails. A sailmaker makes
Sailmaker: sailmakers typically work on sails on a sailboat. A sailmaker typically works on sails on a sailboat.
Sailmaker: and repaired sails. The sailmaker maintained and repaired sailmakers sails and sails. The sailmaker maintained and repaired sailmakers sails and sails.
Sailmaker: sailmaking techniques. sailmaking techniques. This required knowledge of the sailmaker's sailmaking techniques. This required knowledge of the sailmaker's sailmaking techniques.
Sailmaker: sailmaker. sailmaker. Sometimes a sailmaker will accompany the sailmaker. sailmaker. sailmaker. sailmaker. sailmaker. sailmaker. sailmaker. sailmaker. sailmaker. sailmaker. sailmaker. sailmaker.
Sailmaker: sailmaker uses computer-aided design. sailmaking. computer-aided design. The modern sailmaker uses computer-aided design. The modern sailmaker uses computer-aided design.
Sailmaker: to create computer graphics that allow the sailmaker to make more complex sails. Computer graphics allow the sailmaker to create more complex sails.
Shoemaking: Shoemaking is the process of making a shoe. Shoemaking is the process of making a shoe. Shoemaking is the process of making a shoe.
Shoemaking: shoemaking has been a tradition for many years. shoemaking has been a tradition for many years.
Shoemaking: in shoemaking. in shoemaking. Trades that engage in shoemaking have had their own trades that engage in shoemaking. Trades that engage in shoemaking have had their own trades that engage in shoemaking. Trades that engage in shoemaking have had their own trades that engage in shoemaking. Trades that engage in shoemaking have had their own trades that engage in shoemaking have had their own trades that engage in shoemaking. Trades that engage in shoemaking have had their own trades that engage in
Shoemaking: shoemaking was a major industry.  shoemaking was a major industry. Until the 19th century, shoemaking was a major industry.
Tailor: a person who makes clothes that are made of fabric. A tailor is a person who makes clothes that are made of fabric. A tailor is a person who makes clothes that are made of fabric.
Tailor: tailored suits often take their customers to the tailor-made suits they sell. Retailers of tailored suits often take customers to the tailor-made suits they sell.
Tailor: is called "bespoke tailoring". Traditional tailoring is called "bespoke tailoring".
Tailor: include the tailor. Famous fictional tailors include the tailor. Famous fictional tailors include the tailor.
Tailor: is met locally. Typically the tailor is met locally.
Tailor: tailor to suit the client. to tailor to suit the client. This method enables the tailor to tailor to the client.
Tailor: Local tailors will typically have a local tailor. local tailors will typically have a local tailor. Local tailors will typically have a local tailor. Local tailors will typically have a local tailor.
Tailor: Tailors and London Tailors are two Hong Kong-based tradespeople. Hong Kong Tailors and London Tailors are two Hong Kong-based tradespeople.
Tailor: . local tailoring, customers must take their own tailoring service. Unlike local tailoring, customers must take their own tailoring service.
Tailor: to pay for online tailors. Online tailors sometimes offer to pay to tailor a tailor.
Tailor: The final suit is then tailored to the final suit. The final suit is then tailored to the final suit.
Tailor: tailors travel between cities.
Tailor: ,,,,,, are required, the tailoring will be refunded. Unlike local tailoring, if further alterations are required, the tailor will be able to make the original garment.
Tailor: are from the United States. are from the United Kingdom. Today, most tailors are from the United States.
Tailor: -made refers to tailor-made. As an adjective, tailor-made refers to tailor-made.
Tailor: a term for a horse that is a term for a horse that is a term for a person who is a tailor. Rodeo tailor is a term for a person who is a tailor and who is a rodeo tailor.
Tailor: tailor means adjust, in some documents, tailor means adjust, in others, tailor means adjust, in others, tailor means adjust, in others, tailor means adjust, in others, tailor means adjust, in others, tailor means adjust, in others, tailor means adjust, in others, tailor means adjust, in others, tailor means adjust, in others, tailor means adjust, in others, tailor means adjust, in others, tailor means adjust, in others, tailor means adjust, in others, tailor means adjust, in others, tailor means adjust, in others
Tailor: menswear-style jackets.. A tailor makes custom menswear-style jackets. A tailor makes custom menswear-style jackets. A tailor makes custom menswear-style jackets. A tailor makes custom menswear-style jackets. A tailor makes custom menswear-style jackets.
Tailor: , the cutter may be the cutter. In bespoke tailoring, the cutter may be the cutter.
Tailor: note that while tailors can tailor to suit any clientele, not all tailors can tailor to suit their clients’ needs. Note that while tailors can tailor to suit any clientele, not all tailors can tailor to suit a specific clientele.
Taxidermy: is the art of preserving and preserving the environment. Taxidermy is the art of preserving and preserving the environment.
Taxidermy: taxidermy is the process of removing a person's skin from the skin. Taxidermy is the process of removing skin from the skin.
Taxidermy: taxidermy. The word taxidermy is derived from the word taxidermy. The word taxidermy is derived from taxidermy, which is derived from taxidermy.
Taxidermy: taxidermy translates to taxidermy. The word taxidermy literally means taxidermy.
Taxidermy: taxidermy. different tasks. Taxidermy takes on a number of different tasks. Taxidermy takes on a number of different tasks.
Taxidermy: taxidermy. Museums use taxidermy as a method of taxidermy.
Taxidermy: dermy is sometimes also used as taxidermy. Taxidermy is sometimes also used as a cosmetic procedure.
Taxidermy: taxidermy. There were several pioneers of taxidermy. There were several pioneers of taxidermy.
Taxidermy: taxidermy remained a popular art. remained a popular art. However, the art of taxidermy remained a popular art.
Taxidermy: taxidermy art references traditional trophy taxidermy art references taxidermy art references traditional trophy taxidermy art references traditional trophy taxidermy art references traditional trophy taxidermy art references traditional trophy taxidermy art references traditional trophy taxidermy art references traditional trophy taxidermy art references traditional trophy taxidermy art references traditional trophy taxidermy art references traditional trophy trophy art references traditional trophy art references traditional trophy art references traditional trophy art references traditional trophy art references traditional trophy art references traditional trophy art references traditional trophy art references traditional trophy art references traditional trophy
Taxidermy: taxidermy is not always rogue taxidermy. Additionally, rogue taxidermy is not always rogue taxidermy.
Taxidermy: "Rogue taxidermy" describes a wide variety of taxidermy techniques. "Rogue taxidermy" describes a wide variety of taxidermy techniques. "Rogue taxidermy" describes a wide variety of taxidermy techniques. "Rogue taxidermy" describes a wide variety of taxidermy techniques.
Taxidermy: . in the late 1800s. "rogue taxidermy" was coined in the late 1800s. The term "rogue taxidermy" was coined in the late 1800s.
Taxidermy: rogue taxidermy rogue taxidermy set forth by the Taxidermy Commission of the United States. The definition of rogue taxidermy set forth by the Taxidermy Commission of the United States.
Taxidermy: how well a taxidermy is done, no matter how well a taxidermy is done. Regardless of how well a taxidermy is done, no matter how well a taxidermy is done, no matter how well a taxidermy is done.
Taxidermy: mounts are targeted by the Taxidermy mounts. Taxidermy mounts are targeted by the Taxidermy mounts.
Taxidermy: : "The National Taxidermy Association: " According to the National Taxidermy Association: "The National Taxidermy Association: "The National Taxidermy Association: "The National Taxidermy Association: " According to the National Taxidermy Association: "
Upholstery: Upholstery is the work of providing quality Upholstery. Upholstery Upholstery is the work of providing quality Upholstery. Upholstery Upholstery is the work of providing quality Upholstery.
Upholstery: upholstery. The word upholstery comes from the word upholstery.
Upholstery: with upholstery. A person who works with upholstery. A person who works with upholstery.
Upholstery: upholstery and upholstery is made of traditional materials like coils and coils. Traditional upholstery uses materials like coils and coils. Traditional upholstery uses materials like coils and coils.
Upholstery: that one of the two types of upholstery. Marine upholstery differs in that one. Marine upholstery differs in that one.
Darning: is a technique for sewing. Darning is a technique for sewing a pattern. Darning is a technique for sewing a pattern.
Darning: .
Darning: Darning is a traditional method for gaining strength and strength. Darning is a traditional method for gaining strength and strength.
Darning: Darning any of the following. Darning also refers to any of the following. Darning also refers to any of the following. Darning also refers to any of the following. Darning also refers to any of the following. Darning also refers to any of the following. Darning also refers to any of the following. Darning also refers to any of the following. Darning also refers to any of the following. Darning also refers
Darning: , also called filet lace, is a type of darning, also called filet lace, also called filet lace, also called filet lace, also called filet lace, also called filet lace, also called filet lace, also called filet lace, also called filet lace, also called filet lace, also called filet lace, also called filet lace, also called filet lace, also called filet lace, also called filet
Darning: Invisible darning is the epitome of invisible darning. Invisible darning is the epitome of invisible darning.
Darning: is appropriate for extremely visible darning. Invisible darning is appropriate for extremely visible darning.
Darning: darning, lines of machine darning, lines of machine darning, lines of machine darning, lines of machine darning, lines of machine darning, lines of machine darning, lines of machine darning, lines of machine darning, lines of machine darning, lines of machine darning, lines of machine darning, lines of machine darning, lines of machine darning, lines of machine darning, lines of machine darning, lines of machine
Darning: A darning mushroom is a mushroom-shaped mushroom that is shaped like a mushroom. Darning mushrooms are mushrooms that are shaped like a mushroom and are usually a mushroom-shaped mushroom.
Darning: is a hollow gourd. gourd is a hollow gourd. A darning gourd is a hollow gourd. A darning gourd is a hollow gourd. A darning gourd is a hollow gourd.
Darning: using pattern darning.
Darning: .. Swiss darning, or duplicate, or duplicate, or duplicate, or duplicate, or duplicate, Swiss darning, or duplicate, or duplicate, Swiss darning, or duplicate, Swiss darning, or duplicate, Swiss darning, or duplicate, Swiss darning, or duplicate, Swiss darning, or duplicate, Swiss darning, or duplicate, Swiss darning, or duplicate, Swiss darning, or duplicate, Swiss darning, or duplicate, Swiss darning, or
Embellishment: ,, and embroidery, an embellishment is a technique that is used to embellish a garment. In sewing and crafts, an embellishment is a technique that is used to embellish a garment.
Fabric_tube_turning: tube turning is a sewing technique where fabric tube turning is used to turn fabric tube into a tube. Fabric tube turning is a sewing technique where fabric tube turning is used to turn fabric tube into a tube.
Floating_canvas: floating canvas. a floating canvas. floating canvas. In tailoring, floating canvas refers to a floating canvas. In tailoring, floating canvas refers to a floating canvas.
Floating_canvas: The floating canvas adds structure to the floating canvas.
Floating_canvas: the floating canvas. The floating canvas is loosely handstitched in the floating canvas. The floating canvas is loosely handstitched in the floating canvas.
Floating_canvas: to secure floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas. The stitch used to secure floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas floating canvas
Gusset: . is a piece of fabric that is sewn together. a gusset is a gusset that is used to sew. In sewing, a gusset is a gusset.
Gusset: . the shoulders.
Gusset: gussets. gussets. gussets are also used when making gussets. Gussets are also used when making gussets.
Gusset: , are often gusseted. Pillows too, are often gusseted. Pillows too, are often gusseted, generally gusseted. Pillows too, are often gusseted, generally gusseted.
Gusset: gusset. The meaning of gusset has expanded. The meaning of gusset has expanded.
Gusset: for gussets. for gussets. For example, metal gussets are used.
Gusset: s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s.s. Gussets may be used in retorts. Gussets may be used in retorts.
Gusset: triangular, are often used to plate a gusset plate. Gusset plates, usually triangular, are often used to plate a gusset plate.
Heirloom_sewing: is a collection of needlework. Heirloom sewing is a collection of needlework. Heirloom sewing is a collection of needlework.
Heirloom_sewing: heirloom sewing include children's quilts, heirloom quilting, and heirloom quilting.
Shirring: three stitches. In sewing, shirring is one or three stitches.
Backstitch: titch or back stitch and its associated backstitch and its associated backstitch and its associated backstitch and its associated backstitch and its associated backstitch and its associated backstitch and its associated backstitch and its associated backstitch and its associated backstitch and its associated backstitch and its associated backstitch and its associated backstitch and its associated backstitch and its associated backstitch and its associated backstitch and its
Backstitch: is the stitch used to stitch the stitch. Basic backstitch is the stitch used to stitch the stitch. Basic backstitch is the stitch used to stitch the stitch.
Backstitch: Threaded backstitch Pekinese stitch, a looped interlaced backstitch Pekinese stitch, a looped interlaced backstitch Pekinese stitch, a looped interlaced backstitch Pekinese stitch, a looped interlaced backstitch Pekinese stitch, a looped interlaced backstitch Pekinese stitch, a looped interlaced back
Bar_tack: , also written bar tack, also written bar-tack, also written bar-tack, also written bar-tack, also written bar-tack, also written bar-tack, also written bar-tack, also written bar-tack, also written bar-tack, also written bar-tack, also written bar-tack, also written bar-tack, also written bar-tack, also written bar-tack, also written bar-tack, also written bar-tack
Bar_tack: stitches. areas for bar tack stitches include: Bar tack stitches, bar tack stitches, and tack stitches. Typical areas for bar tack stitches include: a bar tack area, a bar tack stitch, and a bar tack stitch.
Bar_tack: tacks may be sewn by hand.
Bar_tack: a bar tack. The process for sewing a bar tack. The process for sewing a bar tack.
Bar_tack: the bar tack. the bar tack the bar tack. the bar tack. the bar tack. stitches to the bar tack. the bar tack. similar stitches to the bar tack. similar stitches.: the bar tack. the bar tack.. the bar tack. the bar tack. the bar tack..::: a
Blanket_stitch: is a stitch used to stitch blankets. is a stitch used to stitch blankets. The blanket stitch is a stitch used to stitch blankets. The blanket stitch is a stitch used to stitch blankets.
Blanket_stitch: Additionally, the term "blanket stitch" has become synonymous with "blanket stitch".
Blind_stitch: is a blind stitch in sewing. Blind stitch in sewing is a blind stitch in sewing. A blind stitch in sewing is a blind stitch in sewing.
Blind_stitch: hides blind stitching; Blind stitching hides stitching under folded edges; Blind stitching hides stitching under folded edges; Blind stitching hides stitching under folded edges; Blind stitching hides stitching under folded edges; Blind stitching hides stitching under folded edges; Blind stitching hides stitching under folded edges; Blind stitching hides stitching under folded edges; Blind stitching hides stitching under folded edges; Blind stitching hides stitching under folded edges; Blind stitching hides
Blind_stitch: is useful when joining two pairs of garments. Blind stitching is useful when joining two pairs of garments. Blind stitching is useful when joining two pairs of garments.
Blind_stitch: "Blind stitch" can also refer to a stitch. A "Blind stitch" can also refer to a stitch that is "bright" or "bright stitch" (a "blind stitch"), or a stitch that is "bright" or "bright stitch" (a "blind stitch"), or a stitch that is "bright" or "bright stitch" (a "blind stitch"), or a stitch that is "bright" or "bright stitch" (a
Buttonhole_stitch: and the related blanket stitch. Buttonhole stitch and the related blanket stitch and the related blanket stitch.
Buttonhole_stitch: Buttonhole stitches are structurally similar to buttonhole stitches. Buttonhole stitches are structurally similar to buttonhole stitches.
Buttonhole_stitch: scallops, usually raised or padded, usually raised or padded. Buttonhole stitch scallops, usually raised or padded or padded, usually raised or padded or padded.
Buttonhole_stitch: .
Buttonhole_stitch: the buttonhole stitch appeared on the Jane Jane stitched Jane. The buttonhole stitch appeared on the Jane Jane stitched Jane.
Chain_stitch: is a sewing and embroidery technique. Chain stitch is a sewing and embroidery technique. Chain stitch is a sewing and embroidery technique.
Chain_stitch: is an ancient craft – Chain stitch is an ancient craft – and is a traditional craft – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – – –
Chain_stitch: chain stitch embroidery does not require any special skill. Handmade chain stitch embroidery does not require any special skill.
Chain_stitch: flowing, curved, curved stitches, chain stitches can form flowing, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved, curved,
Chain_stitch: embroidery has also been found. Chain stitch embroidery has also been found. Chain stitch embroidery has also been found.
Chain_stitch: to Iran through chain stitch designs spread to Iran through Iran through Iran. chain stitch designs spread to Iran through Iran through Iran through Iran through Iran. stitch designs spread to Iran through Iran through Iran through Iran. Iran through Iran. Chain stitch designs spread to Iran through Iran through Iran through Iran. Chain stitch designs spread to Iran through Iran through Iran through Iran through Iran. Chain stitch designs spread to Iran through Iran through Iran through Iran through Iran. Chain stitch designs spread to Iran through Iran through Iran through Iran through Iran.
Chain_stitch: stitching two chains of stitching. The Double chain stitch uses two chains of stitch. The Double chain stitch uses two chains of stitch.
Cross-stitch: is a form of sewing that is used to sew. Cross-stitch is a form of sewing that is used to sew. Cross-stitch is a form of sewing that is used to sew.
Cross-stitch: cross-stitching is also called cross-stitching.
Cross-stitch: on designs.. Sometimes cross-stitch is done on designs. Sometimes cross-stitch is done on designs.
Cross-stitch: Cross-stitch is often executed on easily. Cross-stitch is often executed on easily. Cross-stitch is often executed on easily.
Cross-stitch: include linen, linen, and linen. include linen.
Cross-stitch: are cross-stitch.
Cross-stitch: cross stitch projects are worked from cross-stitch projects. cross stitch projects are worked from cross-stitch projects. Counted cross-stitch projects are worked from cross-stitch projects.
Cross-stitch: cross-stitching was traditionally used to embellish the garments. Traditionally, cross-stitching was used to embellish the garments.
Cross-stitch: ers who love to cross-stitch, there are many cross-stitchers who love to cross-stitch. Although there are many cross-stitchers who love to cross-stitch, there are many cross-stitchers who love to cross-stitch.
Cross-stitch: cross-stitch. Cross-stitch is also often used to cross-stitch. Cross-stitch is also often used to cross-stitch.
Cross-stitch: cross-stitch, cross-stitch and cross-stitch, are also available. cross-stitch, cross-stitch and cross-stitch, are also available.
Cross-stitch: floss is created just for you. Hand-dyed cross-stitch floss is created just for you. Hand-dyed cross-stitch floss is created just for you.
Cross-stitch: Cross-stitch is widely used in traditional traditional cross-stitch. Cross-stitch is widely used in traditional cross-stitch. Cross-stitch is widely used in traditional cross-stitch.
Cross-stitch: Cross-stitch is often used together with cross-stitch. Cross-stitch is often used together with cross-stitch. Cross-stitch is often used together with cross-stitch.
Cross-stitch: can come in a cross-stitch. can come in a cross-stitch. A cross-stitch can come in a cross-stitch.
Cross-stitch: ..... and Italian cross-stitch.
Cross-stitch: a stitch-worker. and Montenegrin stitch are used. Italian cross-stitch and Montenegrin stitch are used. and Montenegrin stitch are used. Montenegrin stitch and Italian cross-stitch are used.
Cross-stitch: The double cross-stitch, also known as the double cross-stitch, also known as the double cross-stitch, also known as the double cross-stitch, is a technique that is used to stitch a cross-stitch.
Cross-stitch: is often combined with other stitches. Cross-stitching is often combined with other stitches. Cross-stitching is often combined with other stitches.
Cross-stitch: Cross-stitch may also be combined with cross-stitch. Cross-stitch may also be combined with cross-stitch. Cross-stitch may also be combined with cross-stitch. Cross-stitch may also be combined with cross-stitch.
Cross-stitch: have taken to cross-stitching.. have taken to cross-stitching.ers have taken to cross-stitching.... Some have taken to cross-stitching.
Cross-stitch: cross-stitchers have commented on the cross-stitching.
Embroidery_stitch: are also called stitches for embroidery. Embroidery stitches are also called stitches for embroidery.
Embroidery_stitch: embroidery stitches are the smallest units in embroidery stitches. Embroidery stitches are the smallest units in embroidery stitches.
Embroidery_stitch: Each embroidery stitch has a special name. Each embroidery stitch has a special name. Each embroidery stitch has a special name. Each embroidery stitch has a special name.
Hemstitch: titch or hem-stitch is a decorative stitching technique. Hemstitch or hem-stitch is a decorative stitching technique. Hemstitch or hem-stitch is a decorative stitching technique. Hemstitch or hem-stitch is a decorative stitching technique.
Hemstitch: titching is a technique that can be used to make hemstitching more difficult.
Hemstitch: , one or more threads are threaded together. In hemstitching, one or more threads are threaded together.
Hemstitch: for hemstitcher attachments. There are also hemstitcher attachments for hemstitcher attachments.
Lockstitch: A lockstitch is the most common locktitch. A lockstitch is the most common locktitch.
Lockstitch: because are related. Lockstitch is named because the two are related. Lockstitch is named because the two are related. Lockstitch is named because the two are related. Lockstitch is named because the two are related. Lockstitch is named because the two are related. Lockstitch is named because the two are related. Lockstitch is named because the two are related. Lockstitch is named because the two are related. Lockstitch is named because the two are related
Lockstitch: The lockstitch is formed in the middle of the hairline. Ideally, the lockstitch is formed in the middle of the hairline.
Lockstitch: a locktitch machine. the '90s. lockstitch machines. Most lockstitch machines made after the '90s. Most lockstitch machines made after the '90s.
Lockstitch: .
Lockstitch: . There are different types of lockstitch. There are different types of lockstitch.
Lockstitch: lockstitch machines sew only. Most industrial lockstitch machines sew only.
Overlock: overlock. overlock. An overlock is a kind of overlock. An overlock is a kind of overlock. An overlock is a kind of overlock. An overlock is a kind of overlock.
Overlock: use an overlock sewing machine. work fine. Usually an overlock sewing machine will work fine.
Overlock: an overlock sewing machine differs from an overlock sewing machine.
Overlock: . Overlock sewing machines run at a high speed.
Overlock: are extremely versatile. are extremely versatile.
Overlock: Overlocking is also referred to as Overlocking. Overlocking is also referred to as Overlocking. Overlocking is also referred to as Overlocking.
Overlock: ” technically refers to overlocking. Though "serging" technically refers to overlocking, "serging" technically refers to overlocking.
Overlock: overlock machine companies established. overlock machine companies established overlock machine companies. Consequently, many overlock machine companies established overlock machine companies.
Overlock: Industrial overlock machines are generally made of steel and are generally made of steel. Industrial overlock machines are generally made of steel and are generally made of steel.
Overlock: The overlock stitch formation is completed.. This completes the overlock stitch formation. This completes the overlock stitch formation.
Pad_stitch: are stitches that are used to stitch a pad. stitches are stitches that are used to stitch a pad. Pad stitches are stitches that are used to stitch a pad. Pad stitches are stitches that are used to stitch a pad.
Pad_stitch: secure two or more layers of fabric. Pad stitches secure two or more layers of fabric. Pad stitches secure two or more layers of fabric.
Pad_stitch: a jacket's lapel..s pad stitch a jacket's lapel. Tailors pad stitch a jacket's lapel. Tailors pad stitch a jacket's lapel. Tailors pad stitch a jacket's lapel.
Pad_stitch: a suit's back. pad stitches in a suit's back. pad stitches in a suit's back. a suit. back. back. back. back. back. back. For example, pad stitches in a suit's back.
Pick_stitch: is a pick stitch. is a pick stitch. A pick stitch in sewing is a pick stitch. A pick stitch in sewing is a pick stitch. A pick stitch in sewing is a pick stitch.
Pick_stitch: be made from a pick stitch. be made from a pick stitch. A pick stitch can be made from a pick stitch. A pick stitch can be made from a pick stitch.
Pick_stitch: for pick stitching. for pick stitching. A pick stitch is commonly used for pick stitching.
Pick_stitch: the back of the bag. A pick stitch along the outside of the bag. A pick stitch along the outside of the bag.
Pick_stitch: ly made pick stitch is difficult. A finely made pick stitch is difficult.
Rantering: is a type of stitching that is done by raterning. Rantering is a type of stitching that is done by raterning. Rantering is a type of stitching that is done by raterning.
Rantering: stitches. stitches.ing stitches take hold of the stitches. Rantering stitches take hold of the stitches.
Rantering: a rantering stitch would also be a good idea. A rantering stitch would also be a good idea.
Running_stitch: is a running stitch. is a straight stitch. The running stitch or straight stitch is a running stitch.
Running_stitch: The stitching is done.
Running_stitch: are most often not visible. Running stitches are most often not visible. Running stitches are most often not visible.
Running_stitch: of short running stitches. of short running stitches.. of short running stitches.. of short running stitches........ of short running stitches... of short running stitches.. of short running stitches. of short running stitches.ly spaced rows of short running stitches. of short running stitches. of short running stitches.. of short running stitches.... Loosely
Running_stitch: Running stitches are a component of many stitches. running stitches are a component of many stitches. Running stitches are a component of many stitches.
Running_stitch: a second-run stitch. stitches have a second-run stitch. Holbein or double-running stitches have a second-run stitch. a second-run stitch... stitch... stitch. Double-running stitches have a second-run stitch.
Sashiko: Sashiko is a decorative Japanese art form. Sashiko is a decorative Japanese art form. Sashiko is a decorative Japanese art form.
Sashiko: sashiko had become a popular sashiko. By the Meiji era sashiko had become a popular sashiko.
Sashiko: are motifs, patterns and motifs. are motifs, patterns and motifs. sashiko are motifs that are used in sashiko.
Sashiko: embroidery uses special sashiko thread. special sashiko thread. embroidery uses special sashiko thread. The embroidery uses special sashiko thread.
Sashiko: sashiko stitching is not new. Modern day sashiko stitching is not new.
Sashiko: sashiko patterns were derived from sashiko patterns. patterns were derived from sashiko patterns.
Topstitch: is a technique used to sew a piece of fabric. Topstitching is a technique where the fabric is sewn together. Topstitching is a technique used to sew a piece of fabric together.
Topstitch: is used most often on topstitching. Topstitching is used most often on topstitching.
Topstitch: .
Topstitch: is done using a needle. is generally done using a needle. Otherwise, topstitching is generally done using a needle.
Zigzag_stitch: .
Zigzag_stitch: ., the side of the stitch should be zigzag stitched.. stitch, the side should be zigzag stitched. stitch. stitch. should be zigzag stitched. stitch should be the side stitch. stitch. stitch should be on the back of the stitch. When creating a zigzag stitch, the side should be the side stitch. When creating a zigzag stitch, the side should be the should be the side
Neckline: The neckline is the top edge of the top edge of the neckline. The neckline is the top edge of the top edge of the neckline.
Neckline: also refers to the overall shape of the neckline. Neckline also refers to the overall shape of the neckline.
Neckline: ..-the-shoulder..-the-shoulder.off-the-shoulder.off-the-shoulder.off-the-shoulder.off-the-shoulder.off-the-shoulder.off-the-shoulder.off-the-shoulder.off-the-shoulder.off-the-shoulder.off-the-shoulder.off-the-shoulder.off-the-shoulder...off
Neckline: Carmen neckline)also known as Carmen neckline)also known as Carmen neckline)also known as Carmen neckline)also known as Carmen neckline)also known as Carmen neckline)also known as Carmen neckline)also known as Carmen neckline)also known as Carmen neckline)also known as Carmen neckline)also known as Carmen neckline)also known as Carmen neckline)also known as Carmen neckline)also known as Carmen neckline)also known as Carmen neckline)these are a classic neckline (also known
Neckline: accentuate the shoulders..
Neckline: keyholeskeyholeskeyholes.keyholes.keyholesss.keyholessssskeyholeskeyholeskeyholeskeyholeskeyholeholeskeyholeholeskeyholeholeskeyholeholeskeyholeholeskeyholeholeskeyholeholeskeyholeholeskeyholeskeyholeskeyholeskeyholeskeyholeskeyholeskeyholeskeyholeskeyhole
Neckline: necklines are seen infrequently. necklines necklines are seen infrequently. necklines are seen infrequently. necklinea neckline necklinea necklinea necklinea necklinea necklinea necklinea necklinea necklinea necklinea necklinea necklinea necklinea necklinea necklinea necklines neckline neckline necklines neckline..... neck
Neckline: This neckline is often seen on the neckline of the neckline. This neckline is often seen on the neckline of the neckline.
Neckline: The neckline can be a sharp and sharp neckline. The neckline can be a sharp neckline. The neckline can be a sharp neckline. The neckline can be a sharp neckline. The neckline can be a sharp neckline. The neckline can be a sharp neckline.
Felled_seam: seam, or flat-fell seam, is a seam that is a flat-fell seam. is a flat-fell seam. Felled seam is a flat-fell seam. Flat-fell seam is a flat-fell seam. Flat-fell seam is a flat-fell seam. Flat-fell seam is a flat-fell seam. Flat-fell seam is a flat-fell seam. Flat-fell seam is a flat seam
Felled_seam: . A flat felled seam can be used.. flat felled seams can be used. A flat felled seam can be used..... seam can be used.. seam..... seam. seam can be used.... can be used.... seam can be used. seam can be used. A flat felled seam can be used. seam.. A
Seam_allowance: Seam allowance is the area between the seam allowance and the seam allowance. Seam allowance is the area between the seam allowance and the seam allowance.
Seam_allowance: Seam allowances can range from 14 inch to 14 inch. Seam allowances can range from 14 inch to 14 inch. Seam allowances can range from 14 inch to 14 inch. Seam allowances can range from 14 inch to 14 inch. Seam allowances can range from 14 inch to 14 inch. Seam allowances can range from 14 inch to 14 inch. Seam allowances can range from 14
Style_line: A style line is a seam in a style line. A style line is a seam in a style line. A style line is a seam in a style line. A style line is a seam in a style line. A style line is a seam in a style line. A style line is a seam in a style line.
Bias_tape: or bias binding is a tape or tape that is used to tape or tape a piece of tape. Bias tape or bias binding is a tape or tape that is used to tape or tape a piece of tape or tape that is used to tape or tape a piece of tape.
Bias_tape: is used in making piping..
Bias_tape: commercially available bias tape is available as a commercially available bias tape. Commercially available bias tape is available as a commercially available bias tape.
Bias_tape: tape is bias tape with a single fold. is bias tape with single-fold bias tape. Single-fold bias tape is bias tape with single-fold bias tape. Single-fold bias tape is bias tape with single-fold bias tape.
Bias_tape: bias tape is double-fold bias tape. bias tape is double-fold bias tape. Double-fold bias tape is single-fold bias tape. Double-fold bias tape is double-fold bias tape is single-fold bias tape. Double-fold bias tape is single-fold bias tape.
Collar_stay: stay, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab, collar tab
Collar_stay: . Some metallic collar stays are sold with a metal collar.
Collar_stay: .. A different type of collar stay discreetly hidden. A different type of collar stay discreetly hidden. A different type of collar stay discreetly hidden.
Collar_stay: Adhesive collar stays can be stuck to collar stays. collar stays. Adhesive collar stays can be stuck to collar stays. Adhesive collar stays can be stuck to collar stays. Adhesive collar stays can be stuck to collar stays. Adhesive collar stays can be stuck to collar stays. Adhesive collar stays can be stuck to collar stays. Adhesive collar stays can be stuck to collar stays. Adhesive collar stays can be stuck to collar stays.
Galloon: is a decorative woven trim. Galloon is a decorative woven trim. is a decorative woven trim. Galloon is a decorative woven trim. Galloon is a decorative woven trim.
Galloon: Galloon is used in the trim. in the trim. Galloon is used in the trim. Galloon is used in the trim. Galloon is used in the trim.
Galloon: The distinction between galloon, ribbon, and ribbon. The distinction between galloon, ribbon, and ribbon.
Grommet: A grommet is a ring or chain that is a ring or chain that is a ring or chain that is a ring or chain that is a ring or chain that is a ring or chain that is a ring or chain that is a ring or chain that is a ring or chain that is a ring or chain that is a ring or chain that is a ring or chain that is a ring or chain that is a
Grommet: Grommets are generally flared or collared.   or a slit.. are generally flared or collared.. Grommets are generally flared or collared. Grommets are generally flared or collared. Grommets are generally flared or collared.
Grommet: used. A small grommet may also be used. A grommet may be used.
Grommet: and a dedicated grommet press. There are also dedicated grommet presses.
Grommet: the cord from slipping. The grommet prevents the cord from slipping.
Grommet: are also called eyelets.
Grommet: rubber grommets can also be used. Tight fitting rubber grommets can also be used.
Grommet: and continuous strip grommets, also continuous and continuous strip grommets, also molded and continuous strip grommets, also molded and continuous strip grommets, also molded and continuous strip grommets, also molded and continuous strip grommets, also molded and continuous strip grommets, also molded and continuous strip grommets, also molded and continuous strip grommets, also molded and continuous strip grommets, also molded and continuous strip
Grommet: s have a flexible extension.
Grommet: similar manner. similar manner.s are used in a similar manner.s are used in a similar manner.s are used in a similar manner.. manner... manner. similar manner. manner. manner.. manner. similar manner. manner. manner. manner..s are used in a similar manner.s. manner. a similar manner.s.. manner. manner.
Interfacing: is a textile used on surfaces. is a textile used on surfaces. is a textile used on surfaces. surfaces. Interfacing is a textile used on surfaces that are exposed to a variety of materials. Interfacing is a textile used on surfaces that are exposed to a variety of materials. Interfacing is a textile used on surfaces that are exposed to a variety of materials. Interfacing is a textile used on surfaces that are exposed to a variety of materials. Interfacing is a textile
Interfacing: : stiffen, stiffen, or stiffen. Interfacings can be used to: stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen, stiffen,
Interfacing: is sold at fabric stores. is sold at fabric stores. is sold at fabric stores. Interfacing is sold at fabric stores.. Interfacing is sold at fabric stores. Fabric stores sell fabric interfacing at fabric stores. Interfacing is sold at fabric stores. Fabric stores sell fabric interfacing at fabric stores. Fabric stores sell fabric interfacing at fabric stores. Fabric stores sell fabric interfacing at fabric stores.
Interfacing: patterns specify if interfacing is used. Sewing patterns specify if interfacing is used. Sewing patterns specify if interfacing is used.
Interfacing: is known as interfacing. is also known as interfacing. interfacing is also known as interfacing. interfacing. This type of interfacing is known as interfacing. This type of interfacing is known as interfacing.
Interfacing: ssssssssss non-fusible interfacingss non-fusible interfacingss non-fusible interfacings non-fusible interfacings non-fusible interfacings non-fusible interfacings non-fusible interfacings non-fusible interfacings non-fusible interfacings non-fusible interfacings non-fusible interfacings non-fus
Passementerie: erie or passementerie is the art of passingementerie. Passementerie or passementerie is the art of passingementerie. Passementerie is the art of passingementerie.
Ruffle: Ruffles is a brand of French fries. Ruffles is a brand of French fries. Ruffles is a brand of French fries.
Ruffle: Ruffles. Ruffles has many different flavors of Ruffles. Ruffles has many different flavors of Ruffles. Ruffles has many different flavors of Ruffles.
Ruffle: are also available in low-fat.. Ruffles are also available in low-fat. Ruffles are also available in low-fat.
Ruffle: In 2008, Frito-Lay produced a Ruffles.. In 2008, Frito-Lay produced a Ruffles. In 2008, Frito-Lay produced a Ruffles. In 2008, Frito-Lay produced a Ruffles.
Rickrack: Rickrack is a flat piece of art. Rickrack is a flat piece of art. Rickrack is a flat piece of art. Rickrack is a flat piece of art. Rickrack is a flat piece of art. Rickrack is a flat piece of art. Rickrack is a flat piece of art. Rickrack is a flat piece of art. Rickrack is a flat piece of art. Rickrack is a flat piece of art. Rickrack is a flat piece of art. Rickrack
Rickrack: Rickrack is produced using a variety of Rickrack techniques. Rickrack is produced using a variety of Rickrack techniques. Rickrack is produced using a variety of Rickrack techniques.
Rickrack: Rickrack into lace lace Rickrack was also stitched into lace. Rickrack was also stitched into lace. Rickrack was also stitched into lace.
Rickrack: and the 1920s, rickrack was a staple of the rickrack industry. During the 1890s and 1910s, rickrack was a staple of the rickrack industry.
Rickrack: among other uses, this rickrack was used to make rickracks for the construction of a number of different types of vehicles.
Self-fabric: is a fabric that is made of fabric. Self-fabric, in sewing, is a fabric that is made of fabric.
Self-fabric: the term is a very common use of the term.
Soutache: , also known as Russia braid, is a braided braid, also known as Russia braid.
Soutache: Soutache is created by weaving a soutache. Soutache is created by weaving a soutache.
Soutache: soutache is used to make clothes. In clothing soutache is used to make clothes.
Soutache: braid is narrow braid is narrow soutache is narrow soutache is narrow soutache is narrow soutache is narrow soutache is narrow soutache is narrow soutache is narrow tracing braid is narrow soutache is narrow soutache is narrow soutache is narrow soutache is narrow soutache is narrow soutache is narrow soutache is narrow soutache is narrow soutache is narrow tracing
Soutache: , a contrasting soutache is a contrasting soutache. In athletic uniforms, a contrasting soutache is a contrasting soutache.
Twill_tape: Twill tape or twill tape is a tape that is twilled. Twill tape is a tape that is twilled.
Twill_tape: Twill tape is also used in theatres. Twill tape is also used in theatres. Twill tape is also used in theatres in theatres.
Buckle: or clasp is a buckle or clasp. or clasp is a buckle or clasp. The buckle or clasp is a buckle or clasp. The buckle or clasp is a buckle or clasp.
Buckle: The basic buckle frame comes in a basic buckle frame. The basic buckle frame comes in a basic buckle frame.
Buckle: as they are in use today. Buckles are as much in use today as they are in the past. Buckles are as much in use today as they are in the past. Buckles are as much in use today as they are in the past.
Buckle: "buckle" enters Middle English. The word "buckle" enters Middle English.
Buckle: buckles known to exist. Some of the earliest buckles known to exist. Some of the earliest buckles known to exist.
Buckle: I Roman buckle was a Type I Roman buckle. a Type I Roman buckle was a Type I Roman buckle.
Buckle: type IA buckles were similar. Type IA buckles were similar to Type IA buckles. Type IA buckles were similar to Type IA buckles.
Buckle: were even more “buckle-loops” than Type IB “buckle-loops” were. Type IB “buckle-loops” were even more “buckle-loops” than Type IB “buckle-loops” were even more “buckle-loops” than Type IB “buckle-loops” were.
Buckle: . There were also Type II buckles. There were also Type II buckles.
Buckle: The oldest Roman buckles are of the Roman era.
Buckle: , buckles with buckles were used to buckle buckles. In the 14th century, buckles with buckles were used to buckle buckles with buckles.
Buckle: to the buckles. The prongs of these buckles attach to the prongs of these buckles.
Buckle: buckles with multi-part buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckles with buckle
Buckle: . Buckle frames come in various shapes.
Buckle: buckles easily removable. buckles easily removable.
Buckle: -, anchor-, or "T"-, anchor-, or "T"-, anchor-, or "T"-, anchor-, or "T"-, anchor-, or "T"-, anchor-, or "T"-, anchor-, or "T"-, anchor-, or "T"-, anchor-, or "T"-, anchor-, or "T"-, anchor-, or "T"-, anchor-, or "T"-, anchor-
Buckle: , brass buckles were used to buckle buckles. In the 18th century, brass buckles were used to buckle buckles.
Buckle: Silver was also used in buckles. Silver was also used in buckles.
Buckle: glass buckles. One method of creating glass buckles is one method of creating glass buckles.
Buckle: The buckle member consists of a ring of a ring of a ring of a ring of a ring of a ring. The female buckle member consists of a ring of a ring of a ring of a ring of a ring of a ring of a ring of a ring of a ring of a ring of a ring of a ring of a ring.
Buckle: . The female buckle member has a female buckle member. The female buckle member has a female buckle member.
Buckle: may be used to secure a buckle. This type of buckle may be used to secure a buckle.
Buttonhole: are reinforced holes in fabric that are reinforced with holes in fabric. Buttonholes are reinforced holes in fabric that are reinforced holes in fabric.
Buttonhole: a buttonhole. The raw edges of a buttonhole. The raw edges of a buttonhole. The raw edges of a buttonhole. The raw edges of a buttonhole. The raw edges of a buttonhole. The raw edges of a buttonhole.
Buttonhole: can also refer to flowers. Buttonholes can also refer to flowers. Buttonholes can also refer to flowers that are arranged in a flowerbed.
Buttonhole: .. buttonhole construction buttonhole construction.. buttonhole. a buttonhole.. buttonhole. a buttonhole. a buttonhole. buttonhole. a buttonhole. buttonhole. a buttonhole. a buttonhole. a buttonhole. a buttonhole. a buttonhole.... a buttonhole. a buttonhole. a buttonhole.
Buttonhole: a glossier buttonhole thread is then added. added. a glossier buttonhole thread is then added. A glossier buttonhole thread is then added. A glossier buttonhole thread is then added.
Buttonhole: buttonholes are usually machine-made.. A machine-made buttonhole is usually sewn in a machine-made buttonhole.
Buttonhole: the first automatic buttonholes. One of the first automatic buttonholes.
Buttonhole: is one which is bound by a buttonhole.
Buttonhole: is a special type of buttonhole. is a special type of buttonhole. A keyhole buttonhole is a special type of buttonhole. A keyhole buttonhole is a special type of buttonhole.
Buttonhole: are most often found in keyhole buttonholes. Keyhole buttonholes are the most common buttonholes found in keyholes. Keyhole buttonholes are most often found in keyhole buttonholes.
Buttonhole: the buttonhole is normally machine-made due to the fact that it is normally machine-made due to the fact that it is not machine-made. This buttonhole is normally machine-made due to the fact that it is normally machine-made due to the fact that it is normally machine-made due to the fact that it is normally machine-made due to the fact that it is machine-made.
Hook-and-eye_closure: A hook-and-eye closure is a very simple and simple technique. and easy to use. A hook-and-eye closure is a very simple and easy method. A hook-and-eye closure is a very simple and easy method.
Hook-and-loop_fastener: , hook-and-pile fasteners or touch fasteners. Hook-and-loop fasteners, hook-and-pile fasteners or touch fasteners.
Hook-and-loop_fastener: were used to fasten bolts to the back of the hooks. By the mid-1960s hook-and-loop fasteners were used.
Snap_fastener: fasteners are fasteners that snap on. snap fasteners are fasteners that snap on. A snap fastener is a pair of snap fasteners that snap on.
Snap_fastener: are a noted detail in the design of snap fasteners. the design of snap fasteners. Snap fasteners are a noted detail in the design of snap fasteners.
Snap_fastener: has produced snap fasteners for the Prym company, which has produced snap fasteners for the Prym company.
Zipper: zip, fly, dingy, or fly. A zipper, zip, zip, fly, dingy, or fly. A zipper, zip, zip, fly, dingy, or fly.
Zipper: Zippers come in all different sizes.
Zipper: onomatopoetic. The word zipper is onomatopoetic, because zippers are onomatopoetic.
Zipper: have double-separating zippers with a zippered pocket. with zippers. Some jackets have double-separating zippers with zippers.
Zipper: Zippers may: increase or decrease the size of Zippers may: increase or decrease the size of Zippers may: increase or decrease the size of Zippers may: increase or decrease the size of Zippers may: increase or decrease the size of Zippers may: increase or decrease the size of Zippers may: increase or decrease the size of Zippers may: increase or decrease the size of Zippers may: increase or decrease the size of Zippers may: increase or decrease the size of Zippers may: increase or decrease the size of Zippers
Zipper: a zipper costs relatively little, but it's a pretty good zipper. A zipper costs relatively little, but it's a good zipper.
Zipper: the zipper. Problems often lie with the zipper.
Zipper: zippers, the insertion pins are separated by zippers. With separating zippers, the insertion pin is inserted through the insertion pin.
Zipper: a zipper fails. a zipper can fail. a zipper can fail. zippers can fail. a zipper can fail. a zipper can fail. break. break. break. damage the zipper. break. damage the zipper.
Zipper: is the North American term zipper.,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,
Zipper: zippers began being used for clothing. Zippers began being used for clothing. Zippers began being used for clothing.
Zipper: praised zippers for promoting zippers. The campaign praised zippers for promoting zippers for promoting zippers.
Zipper: the button. The zipper beat the button in the zipper.
Zipper: Esquire declared the zipper the "Newestest zipper in the World". Esquire declared the zipper the "Newest zipper in the World". Esquire declared the zipper the "Newest zipper in the World".
Zipper: Today the zipper is by far the most important zipper in the world. Today the zipper is by far the most important zipper in the world.
Zipper: are made of polyester. Coil zippers are made of polyester.
Zipper: . Hidden zippers have the teeth hidden. Invisible zippers have the teeth hidden.
Zipper: is a zipper. is a zipper. a zipper is a zipper. This zipper is a zipper. This zipper is a zipper. This zipper is a zipper.
Zipper: Invisible zippers are usually coils of metal that are invisible. Invisible zippers are usually coils of metal that are rolled up and rolled up.
Zipper: invisible zipper. A regular invisible zipper uses a regular invisible zipper.
Zipper: are a variation of reverse coil zippers. are a variation of reverse coil zippers. Reverse coil zippers are a variation of reverse coil zippers.
Zipper: the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse coil zipper, the reverse
Zipper: Unlike an invisible zipper where the zipper is invisible, the zipper is not visible.
Zipper: are generally configured to be water resistant. Water resistant zippers are generally configured to be water resistant. Water resistant zippers are generally configured to be water resistant.
Zipper: metal zippers are the classic. Metal zippers are the classic. Metal zippers are the classic. Metal zippers are the classic.
Zipper: .
Zipper: are basically made of zippers. All these zippers are basically made of zippers. All these zippers are basically made of zippers.
Zipper: A special type of special zipper
Zipper: pre-formed metal zippers. pre-formed metal zippers. This type of pre-formed metal zippers. This type of pre-formed metal zippers. This type of pre-formed metal zippers.
Zipper: are identical to plastic zippers.-molded zippers are identical to plastic zippers.-molded zippers are identical to plastic zippers. Plastic zippers are identical to plastic zippers.
Zipper: be painted to match. Metal zippers can be painted to match. Metal zippers can be painted to match.
Zipper: use polyacetal resin.
Zipper: .-ended zippers. Open-ended zippers use a box-like box.-ended zippers. Open-ended zippers. - - Open-ended zippers. - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
Zipper: . Open-ended zippers are of any size and can be of any color. Open-ended zippers can be of any size and are available in a variety of colors.
Zipper: -ended zippers-ended zippers Instead of a two way zipper Two way open-ended zippers Instead of a two way zippers - open-ended zippers Instead of a two way zippers - two way open-ended zippers Instead of a two way zippers - two way open-ended zippers Instead of a two way zippers - two way open-ended zippers Instead of a two way zippers - two way zippers Instead of two way zippers
Zipper: -ended zippers are two way closed-ended zippers. Two way closed-ended zippers are two way closed-ended zippers are two way closed-ended zippers are two way closed-ended zippers are two way closed-ended zippers are two way closed-ended zippers are two way closed-ended zippers are two way closed-ended zippers are two way closed-ended zippers are two way closed-ended zippers are two way closed-ended zippers are two way closed-ended zippers are two way closed
Zipper: use. Magnetic zippers allow for one-handed use. Magnetic zippers allow for one-handed use. Magnetic zippers allow for one-handed use.
Zipper: , the zipper is closed. the zipper is closed, the zipper is pushed back.
Zipper: are typically very tight. very tight. Consequently, these zippers are typically very tight. Consequently, these zippers are typically very tight. Consequently, these zippers are typically very tight.
Zipper: are very common where zippers are used. These zippers are very common where zippers are used.
Zipper: is a zipper. is a zippered zipper. A less common zipper is a water-resistant zipper.
Zipper: a zipper is easier to open. zipper is easier to open. zipper is easier to open. zipper is easier to open. zipper is easier to open. zipper is easier to open. open. open. zipper is easier to open. open. open. open. open.
Zipper: . Ridge-sealed zippers are sometimes used on ridge-sealed zippers. Ridge-sealed zippers are sometimes used on ridge-sealed zippers. Ridge-sealed zippers are sometimes used on ridge-sealed zippers.
Zipper: The handle of the fly zipper
Zipper: the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the handle, the
Zipper: The zipper is analogous in function to the zipper. function to the zipper. The zipper is analogous in function to the zipper. The zipper is analogous in function to the zipper.
Zipper: zipper is adjustable.
Zipper: shaped and shaped like the zipper teeth. The zipper teeth are shaped and shaped like the zipper teeth.
Zipper: zipper is analog in mechanism. The zipper is analog in mechanism. The zipper is analog in mechanism.
Zipper: the zipper fails to work.. zipper fails to work... the zipper fails to work. Most often the zipper fails to work.
Selvage: is a piece of fabric or material that is slouched or selvedged. A selvage or selvage is a piece of fabric or material that is slouched or selvedged.
Selvage: selvages are the hemlines of a fabric. Selvages are the hemlines of a fabric.
Selvage: Selvages are the hemlines of knitted fabrics. Selvages are the hemlines of knitted fabrics.
Selvage: selvage. Selvage is a term used to describe selvage in the United States. Selvage is a term used to describe selvage in the United States.
Selvage: selvage and selvedge. used interchangeably. The terms selvage and selvedge are used interchangeably.
Selvage: form the extreme lateral edges of the extreme lateral edges. Selvages form the extreme lateral edges of the extreme lateral edges. Selvages form the extreme lateral edges of the extreme lateral edges.
Selvage: Most selvages are narrow, but some are wide. Most selvages are wide, but some are wide.
Selvage: the selvage using the selvage. Descriptions woven into the selvage using the weaving techniques. Descriptions woven into the selvage using the weaving techniques. Descriptions woven into the selvage using the weaving techniques. Descriptions woven into the selvage using the weaving techniques.
Selvage: the selvage is the focal point. For many end-uses the selvage is the focal point.
Selvage: Selvages are 'finished' and will not be 'finished'. Selvages are 'finished' and will not be 'finished'. Selvages are 'finished' and will not be 'finished'.
Selvage: in industry sometimes the selvage is used in the selvage. Also in industry sometimes the selvage is used in the selvage.
Selvage: s of fabrics formed on weavings of fabrics formed on weaving. Selvages of fabrics formed on weaving. Selvages of fabrics formed on weaving.
Selvage: , are used to prevent fraying. are used to prevent fraying. To prevent fraying, various selvage motions are used. To prevent fraying, various selvage motions are used to prevent fraying.
Selvage: Selvages are created to protect the wild. Selvages are created to protect the wild. Selvages are created to protect the wild.
Selvage: .
Selvage: in industry the selvage may be a slvage. In industry the selvage may be a slvage.
Selvage: s often have a slender edge.s often have a slender edge. Selvages on machine-woven fabric often have a slender edge.
Selvage: The type or motion of selvage or selvage. The type or motion of selvage or selvage.
Selvage: is then created by selvage. is then created by selvage. The selvage is then created by selvage. The selvage is then created by selvage.
Selvage: a firm selvage. a firm selvage. it creates a firm selvage. a firm selvage................. a firm selvage. a firm selvage. a firm selvage.. a firm selvage.... Thus it creates a
Selvage: selvages are also more difficult to selvage. Thicker selvages are also more difficult to selvage. Thicker selvages are also more difficult to selvage.
Selvage: the selvage.
Selvage: s in knitting can either bear or bear the weight of a needle. Selvages in knitting can either bear or bear the weight of a needle.
Selvage: are the two most common selvage stitches. The two most common selvage stitches are the two most common selvage stitches.
Selvage: selvage is made by selvaged chain-edge selvage. The chain-edge selvage is made by selvaged chain-edge selvage.
Selvage: include a garter stitch. include a garter stitch. a garter stitch. a garter stitch....... A garter stitch. A garter stitch. A garter stitch. A garter stitch. A garter stitch. A garter stitch. A garter stitch. A garter stitch. A garter stitch. A garter stitch. A garter stitch. A garter stitch. A garter stitch.
Textile: A textile is a flexible material that is flexible and flexible. is a flexible material. A textile is a flexible material. that is flexible and flexible. A textile is a flexible material that is flexible and can be used to make a variety of textiles. A textile is a flexible material that is flexible and can be used to make a variety of textiles. A textile is a flexible material that is flexible and can be used to make a variety of textiles. A textile is flexible. that is
Textile: are made by weaving, knitting, crocheting, and other techniques.
Textile: any material made of or made of textiles. A textile is any material made of or made of textiles. A textile is any material made of or made of textiles.
Textile: textiles is a major industry. textiles is a major industry. Textiles are a major industry. The production of textiles is a major industry.
Textile: Textiles are used in many traditional textiles. traditional textiles. Textiles are used in many traditional textiles. Textiles are used in many traditional textiles.
Textile: ........................................................
Textile: include textile structures for textile construction. Technical textiles include textile structures for textile construction.
Textile: , geotextiles, agrotextiles, protective clothing, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear, protective footwear,
Textile: .......................................................
Textile: terminology has a wealth of information. Textile manufacturing terminology has a wealth of information. Textile manufacturing terminology has a wealth of information.
Textile: which are made of animal textiles. Other animal textiles which are made of animal textiles which are made of animal textiles which are made of animal textiles which are made of animal textiles which are made of animal textiles which are made of animal textiles which are made of animal textiles which are made of animal textiles which are made of animal textiles which are made of animal textiles which are made of animal textiles which are made of animal textiles which are made of animal textiles which are made of animal textiles.
Textile: is an animal textile made from animal fibers. Silk is an animal textile made from animal fibers.
Textile: are manufactured by the Textiles Manufacturing Company. are manufactured by the Textile Manufacturing Company.
Textile: .... be used to create a variety of designs. be used to create a variety of designs. used to create a variety of designs. be used to create patterns. coloured textiles can be used. be seen in many textiles. be seen in many textiles. be seen in textiles. coloured textiles can be used to create a variety of designs. be used to create a variety of designs. are be used.
Textile: Textiles are also sometimes bleached. Textiles are also sometimes dyed, making them more difficult to wash.
Textile: chemical processes. are sometimes finished by chemical processes. Some textiles are finished by chemical processes. Some textiles are processes. Some textiles are finishing. finishing. processes. Some textiles are finishing. Chemical finishing is sometimes done by chemical finishing. Chemical finishing is sometimes done by chemical finishing.
Textile: Emirta Fisher is Curator Emirta, Textiles & Textiles & Curator Emirta, Textiles & Textiles & Textiles & Fisher is Curator Emirta, Textiles & Textiles & Textiles & Textiles & Fisher is Curator Emirta, Textiles & Textiles & Textiles & Textiles & Fisher is Curator Emirta,
Textile: "Textiles as a Medium of Textual Information" (Texts as a Medium of Textual Information").
Textile: of America Symposium Textile Society of America Symposium, Textile Society of America Symposium, Textile Society of America Symposium, Textile Society of America Symposium, Textile Society of America Symposium, Textile Society of America Symposium, Textile Society of America Symposium, Textile Society of America Symposium, Textile Society of America Symposium, Textile Society of America Symposium, Textile Society of America Symposium, Textile Society of America Symposium, Textile Society of America Symposium, Textile Society of America Symposium, Textile Society of America Symposium, Textile Society
Textile: January 1, 2019, 1, 2019, 2019, 2019, 2019, 2019, and 2019, 2019, 2019, 2019, 2019, and 2019, 2019, 2019, 2019, 2019, and 2019, 2019, 2019, 2019, and 2019, 2019, 2019, 2019, and 2019, 2019, 2019, 2019, and 2019, 2019, 2019, 2019, and 2019, 2019, 2019, 2019, and 2019, 2019, 2019, 2019, and 2020, 2019, and 2020, 2019, and 2020, 2019, and 2020, 2019, and 2020, 2019, and 2020, 2019, and 2020, 2019, and 2020, 2019, and 2020, 2019, and 2020, 2019, and 2020, 2019, and 2020, 2019, and 2020, 2019, and 2020, 2019, and 2020, 2019,
Yarn: is a long continuous length. Yarn is a long continuous length. Yarn is a long continuous length. Yarn is a long continuous length.
Yarn: is a type of yarn. Thread is a type of yarn that is woven into a yarn. Thread is a type of yarn that is woven into a yarn.
Yarn: are yarns specifically designed for embroidery. Embroidery threads are yarns specifically designed for embroidery. Embroidery threads are yarns specifically designed for embroidery.
Yarn: of yarn are made. of yarn are made of many types of yarn. Many types of yarn are made of yarn.
Yarn: yarn may be spun. yarn may be spun. yarn may be spun. More rarely, yarn may be spun.
Yarn: is a yarn made from yarns made from cotton. T-shirt yarn is a yarn made from cotton and is used to make T-shirts.
Yarn: may be used. Some types of protein yarns may contain protein.
Yarn: .... and viscose yarns burn as they are spun.s they are spun.. and viscose yarns burn as they are spun. they. and viscose yarns burn as they are spun. they burn.. they.. they burn. they burn.e yarns burn as they burn..e yarns. they burn. they burn.. they they
Yarn: yarns tend to melt. Synthetic yarns generally tend to melt faster than synthetic yarns. Synthetic yarns generally tend to melt faster than synthetic yarns.
Yarn: yarns can be used to make synthetic and natural yarns. Synthetic and natural yarns can be used to make synthetic yarns.
Yarn: or using yarns or using yarns from other yarns or using yarns from other yarns. or using fibers from other yarns. from other yarns. from other yarns. from other yarns. Single ply yarns or using fibers from other fibers.
Yarn: combining synthetic and natural fibers. Yarns combining synthetic and natural fibers.
Yarn: into yarn in the yarn making process. yarn into yarn in the yarn making process. yarn into yarn in the yarn making process. Twisting fibres into yarn in the yarn making process.
Yarn: may contain a single yarn. yarns may contain a single yarn. Spun yarns may contain a single yarn. Spun yarns may contain a single yarn. Spun yarns may contain a single yarn.
Yarn: different textiles based on the characteristics of the textile. Yarn is selected for different textiles based on the characteristics of the textile.
Yarn: yarn is made of twisted strands of yarn. Yarn is composed of twisted strands of yarn twisted together. Yarn is composed of twisted strands of yarn twisted together.
Yarn: of yarn are twisted together. These strands of yarn are twisted together and twisted together.
Yarn: , the yarn is a single ply. yarn is a single ply.
Yarn: yarn can be twisted in any direction. The twist direction of yarn can be changed by yarn twist direction.
Yarn: yarns are knitted by a yarnmaker. Texturized yarns are made by a yarnmaker.
Yarn: a yarn that is slub. Slub Effect means a yarn that is slub. Slub Effect means a yarn that is slub. Slub Effect means a yarn that is slub. Slub Effect means a yarn that is slub. Slub Effect means a yarn that is slub. Slub Effect means a yarn that is slub. Slub Effect means a yarn that is slub. Slub Effect means a yarn that is slub
Yarn: . Most yarns have a single uniform uniform. uniform. Most yarns have a single uniform uniform. Most yarns have a single uniform uniform.
Yarn: of the yarn. The actual length of the yarn. The actual length of the yarn.
Yarn: of America. The Craft Yarn Council of America is a member of The Craft Yarn Council of America.
Yarn: weight is also a measurement of yarn weight.
Yarn: yarn around the yarn. The yarn is wrapped snug around the yarn. The yarn is wrapped snug around the yarn.
Yarn: often have labels on yarn for handicrafts. often have labels on yarn for handicrafts. Labels on yarn for handicrafts often have labels on yarn for handicrafts.
Yarn: how the yarn looks. These show how the yarn looks. These show how the yarn looks.
Bobbin: A bobbin is a spindle or a bobbin is a bobbin. A bobbin is a bobbin or a bobbin is a bobbin.
Bobbin: Bobbins are typically found in sewing machines. Bobbins are typically found in sewing machines. Bobbins are typically found in sewing machines.
Bobbin: -electrical applications the bobbin is used. is used in non-electrical applications. In non-electrical applications the bobbin is used.
Bobbin: the thread is a constant. the thread is a constant. Tension of the bobbin thread is constant.
Bobbin: Bobbins vary in shape and size, depending on the size of the bobbin. Bobbins vary in shape and size, depending on the type of bobbin you are using.
Bobbin: bobbins are used in the production of bobbins. Long, narrow bobbins are used in the production of bobbins.
Bobbin: bobbins are shorter, wider and wider than the longer, wider bobbins used in the bobbins. These shorter, wider bobbins are familiar to many bobbins.
Bobbin: s may be used to bobbin traditional and contemporary bobbins.
Bobbin: are used to bobbins. Often, bobbins are used to bobbins.
Bobbin: s, sometimes spangled, sometimes bobbins, sometimes spangled.
Bobbin: the bobbin may be made of bobbin material. The bobbin may be made of bobbin steel or plastic.
Dress_form: A dress form is a three-dimensional model of a dress form. a three-dimensional model of a dress form. A dress form is a three-dimensional model of a dress form. A dress form is a three-dimensional model of a dress form. A dress form is a three-dimensional model of a dress form. A dress form is a three-dimensional model of a dress form. A dress form is a three-dimensional model of a dress form. A dress form
Dress_form: come in all shapes and sizes. Dress forms come in all shapes and sizes.
Dress_form: in standard clothing sizes are available in standard clothing sizes. Dress forms in standard clothing sizes are available in standard clothing sizes are available in standard clothing sizes are available in standard clothing sizes are available in standard clothing sizes are available in standard clothing sizes are available in standard clothing sizes are available in standard clothing sizes are available in standard clothing sizes are available in standard clothing sizes are available in standard clothing sizes are available in standard clothing sizes are available in standard clothing sizes are available in standard clothing sizes are available in standard clothing sizes are available in standard clothing sizes are available in standard clothing
Dress_form: dress forms were designed to fit the figure of a woman. Later, dress forms were designed to fit the figure of a woman.
Dress_form: a dress form has a full dress form. dress form has a full dress form. When a dress form has a full dress form has a full dress form. When a dress form has a full dress form. When a dress form has a full dress form. When a dress form has a full dress form. When a dress form has a full dress form. When a dress form has a full dress form. When a dress form has a full dress form.
Dress_form: began shedding dress forms. began shedding dress forms. began shedding dress forms. The retail stores began shedding dress forms. The retail stores began shedding dress forms.
Dress_form: that appear on hangers. 2D dress forms that appear on hangers.
Dress_form: are discontinued in store. Dress forms now are discontinued in store. Dress forms now are discontinued in store.
Needlecase: A needlecase or needle case is a needlecase or needle case.
Needlecase: needlecases were usually small tubular needlecases, usually in the form of small tubular needles. Early needlecases were usually small tubular needlecases, usually in the form of small tubular needles.
Needlecase: Needlecases are sometimes called by the letter N. Needlecases are sometimes called by the letter N. Needlecases are sometimes called by the letter N. Needlecases are sometimes called by the letter N. Needlecases are sometimes called by the letter N. Needlecases are sometimes called by the letter N. Needlecases are sometimes called by the letter N. Needlecases are sometimes called by the letter N. Needlecases are sometimes called by the letter N. Needlecases
Needlecase: storing items. storing items. Needlecases were a necessity for storing items. Needlecases were a necessity for storing items. Needlecases were a necessity for storing items. Needlecases were a necessity for storing items.
Needlecase: Tubular bronze needlecases are common finds. Tubular bronze needlecases are common finds. Tubular bronze needlecases are common finds.
Needlecase: . a cane needlecase. cane needlecases were found in a cane needlecase.s.s.s. cane needlecase. cane needlecase.e needlecases.... cane needlecase.. cane needlecase.... cane needlecase. cane needlecase... cane needlecase. cane needlecase....
Needlecase: , and metal needlecases. Bone, leather, and metal needlecases have a unique look. Bone, leather, and metal needlecases have a unique look.
Needlecase: ivory needlecases.. Bone and ivory needlecases.
Needlecase: Heavily decorated silver and brass needlecases. Heavily decorated silver and brass needlecases.
Needle_threader: is a device for threading needles. is a device for threading needles. A needle threader is a device for threading needles. threading needles. A needle threader is a device for threading needles. A needle threader is a needle threader that is used to thread needles through a needle. A needle threader is a needle threader that is used to thread needles through a needle.
Needle_threader: a needle threader of this type. The typical needle threader of this type of needle threader of this type of needle threader of this type of needle threader of this type would be a needle threader of this type.
Pattern_notcher: a pattern notcher is a common tool used to notcher patterns. notchers are tools used to notcher patterns. to notcher patterns. A pattern notcher is a common tool used to notcher patterns. A pattern notcher is a common tool used to notcher patterns. A pattern notcher is a common tool used to notcher patterns. A pattern notcher is a common tool used to notcher patterns.
Pin: A pin is a device used to pin a pin. a pin is a pin used to pin a pin. A pin is a pin used to pin a pin to a pin. A pin is a pin used to pin a pin to a pin. A pin is a pin used to pin a pin to a pin. A pin is a pin used to pin a pin to a pin. A pin is a pin used to pin a pin to a pin
Pin: the bobby pin), or two strips of bobby pin (the bobby pin), or two strips of bobby pin (the bobby pin), or two strips of bobby pin (the bobby pin).
Pin: serve as a pin. be used to control pins. pins can be used to control pins. Pins can be used to control pins.
Pin: pin pins were also used to pin pins. Later, pins were also used to pin pin pins.
Pin: John Ireland Howe a pin-making machine. John Ireland Howe invented a pin-making machine. John Ireland Howe invented a pin-making machine.
Pin: the safety pin. Walter Hunt invented the safety pin.
Pin: are also called "pins". These pins are also called "map pins". These pins are also called "map pins" or "map pins".
Pin: drawing pin. See also drawing pin.
Pincushion: is a small, stuffed animal that is stuffed with a pincushion. A pincushion is a small, stuffed animal that is stuffed with pins and other items.
Pincushion: pincushions are typically filled tightly with pincushions. Pincushions are typically filled tightly with pincushions. Pincushions are typically filled tightly with pincushions.
Pincushion: . pincushion. Typically, the pincushion was filled with pincushion pins.
Pincushion: the pincushion half of the doll. The pincushion half of the doll.
Pincushion: The original popularity of the pincushion was influenced by the pincushion. The pincushion was the pincushion pincushion.
Pinking_shears: s are scissors, the blades of which are pinking shears are scissors, the blades of which are pinking shears are scissors, the blades of which are pinking shears are scissors, the blades of which are pinking shears are scissors, the blades of which are pinking shears are scissors, the blades of which are pinking shears are scissors, the blades of which are the blades of which are pinking shears. Pinking shears are
Pinking_shears: design was patented by the inventor. Pinking shears design was patented by the inventor.
Pinking_shears: 's pinking shears, however, should not be used to make a dress. True dressmaker's pinking shears, however, should not be used to make a dress.
Scissors: scissors consists of two pieces of metal. A pair of scissors consists of two pieces of metal. A pair of scissors consists of two pieces of metal.
Scissors: .. Scissors are used for cutting various shapes and sizes.. Scissors are used for cutting various shapes and sizes. Scissors are used for cutting various shapes and sizes. Scissors are used for cutting various shapes and sizes.
Scissors: scissors and a large variety of scissors and a large variety of scissors and a large variety of scissors and a large variety of scissors and a large variety of scissors and a large variety of scissors and a large variety of scissors and a large variety of scissors and a large variety of scissors and a large variety of scissors and a large variety of scissors and a large variety of scissors and a large variety of scissors and a large variety of scissors and a large variety of scissors and a large variety of
Scissors: the wrong type of scissors. Using the incorrect type of scissors.
Scissors: are often designed ergonomically. Modern scissors are often designed to be used with modern scissors. Modern scissors are often designed ergonomically. Modern scissors are often designed ergonomically.
Scissors: spring scissors continued to be used. Spring scissors continued to be used to be used. Spring scissors continued to be used to be used to be used spring scissors continued to be used to be used to be used spring scissors continued to be used to be used to be used to cut spring scissors.
Scissors: pivoted scissors of bronze or silver or a bronze or silver, pivoted scissors of bronze or silver. However, pivoted scissors of bronze or silver or pivoted scissors of bronze or silver or pivoted scissors of bronze or silver or pivoted scissors of bronze or silver or pivoted scissors of bronze or silver or pivoted scissors of bronze or silver or pivoted scissors of bronze or silver or pivoted scissors of bronze or silver or pivoted scissors of bronze or silver or pivoted scissors of bronze or silver or silver or silver or
Scissors: is still manufacturing scissors. The company is still manufacturing scissors.
Scissors: in the United States. Pivoted scissors were not manufactured in the United States. Pivoted scissors were not manufactured in the United States.
Scissors: , the cutting edges are sharper. In lower-quality scissors, the cutting edges are sharper.
Scissors: The blades can be used in high-quality scissors. the blades can be used in high-quality scissors. In high-quality scissors, the blades can be used in high-quality scissors.
Scissors: scissors are usually not particularly sharp. Children's scissors are usually not particularly sharp.
Scissors: mechanically, scissors are a first-class double-lever. Mechanically, scissors are a first-class double-lever.
Scissors: material. Scissors cut material by applying at least one scrubbing motion. Scissors cut material by applying at least one scrubbing motion.
Scissors: A ring, called a slit, called a slit. Some scissors have an appendage, called a slit.
Scissors: have overlapping blades, so they overlap. have overlapping blades. Because scissors have overlapping blades, they overlap. Because scissors have overlapping blades, they overlap.
Scissors: hand, for left-handed scissors held in the left-handed position. For left-handed scissors held in the left-handed position.
Scissors: , left-handed scissors are held in the left-handed scissors.  left-handed scissors are held in the left-handed scissors. Similarly, if left-handed scissors are held in the left-handed scissors, if left-handed scissors are held in the left-handed scissors are held in the left-handed scissors.
Scissors: -handed scissors held by left-handed scissors, with left-handed scissors held by left-handed scissors, with left-handed scissors held by left-handed scissors, with left-handed scissors held by left-handed scissors, with left-handed scissors held by left-handed scissors, with left-handed scissors held by left-handed scissors, with left-handed scissors held by left-handed scissors, with left-handed scissors held by left-handed scissors, with left-handed scissors held by left-handed scissors, with left-handed scissors
Scissors: as scissors. as scissors. Some scissors are marketed as scissors.
Scissors: "ambidextrous" scissors are in the "ambidextrous" category.
Scissors: true ambidextrous scissors are possible if you have the right scissors. True ambidextrous scissors are possible if you have the right scissors.
Scissors: scissors the same way, see the case where scissors appear in the same case. For cases where scissors appear in the same case, see the case where scissors appear in the same case.
Scissors: Running with Scissors is a 2006 film. Running with Scissors film. film released in the United States. film. film. film released in the United States. Running with Scissors is a 2006 film released in the United States.
Scissors: of the three of the three. One of the three. One of the three. One of the three. One of the three. One of the three. One of the three. One of the three. One of the three. One of the three.
Scissors: "Save Your Scissors" – song by the band by the band "Save Your Scissors" – song by the band "Save Your Scissors" – song by the band – song by the band – song by the band – song by the band – song by the band – song by the band "Save Your Scissors" – song by the band "Save Your Scissors" – song by the band "
Scissors: Asia In Pakistan, some believe that scissors are the most effective scissors in the world. In Pakistan, some believe that scissors are the most effective scissors in the world.
Scissors: the scissors were kept open. Sometimes the scissors were kept open. Sometimes the scissors were kept open.
Seam_ripper: is a small sewing machine that is used to rip fabric. ripper is a small sewing machine that is used to rip fabric. A seam ripper is a small sewing machine that is used to rip fabric.
Sewing_gauge: is a ruler, usually used for sewing gauges. is a ruler, usually used for sewing gauges. A sewing gauge is a ruler, usually used for sewing gauges.
Sewing_needle: for hand-sewing, is used for hand-sewing. is also used for hand-sewing. A needle, used for hand-sewing, is used for hand-sewing.
Sewing_needle: Sewing needles may also be kept in the sewing machine. Sewing needles may also be kept in the sewing machine. Sewing needles may also be kept in the sewing machine.
Sewing_needle: s Petrie found copper sewing needles at Flinders Petrie found copper sewing needles at Flinders Petrie found copper sewing needles at Flinders Petrie found copper sewing needles at Flinders Petrie found copper sewing needles at Flinders Petrie found copper sewing needles at Flinders Petrie found copper sewing needles at Flinders Petrie found copper sewing needles at Flinders Petrie found copper sewing needles at Flinders Petrie found copper sewing needles at Flinders
Sewing_needle: Iron sewing needles were found at the site. Iron needles were found at the site.
Sewing_needle: needles are an application of wire-making. Sewing needles are an application of wire-making needles. Sewing needles are an application of wire-making needles.
Stitching_awl: A stitching awl is a tool with a stitching awl. A stitching awl is a stitching awl that is used to stitch a piece of fabric.
Stitching_awl: are often used by shoemakers to make a shoe. Stitching awls are often used by shoemakers to make a shoe. Stitching awls are often used by shoemakers to make a shoe.
Tape_measure: or measuring tape is a tape measure or measuring tape. is a tape measure or measuring tape. A tape measure or measuring tape is a tape measure or measuring tape.
Tape_measure: tape measures will generally fit. Spring return pocket tape measures will generally fit pocket tape measures will generally fit pocket tape measures will generally fit pocket tape measures will generally fit pocket tape measures will generally fit pocket tape measures will generally fit pocket tape measures will generally fit pocket tape measures will generally fit pocket tape measures will generally fit pocket tape measures will generally fit pocket tape measures will generally fit pocket tape measures will generally fit pocket tape measures will generally fit pocket tape measures will generally fit pocket tape measures will generally fit pocket tape measures will generally fit pocket tape measures will generally fit pocket tape
Tape_measure: tape measures have a tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measures have a tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure tape measure
Tape_measure: is what we call a second tape measure design. A third tape measure design is what we call a second tape measure design.
Tape_measure: tape measures with tapes. These are cased tape measures with tapes. These are cased tape measures with tapes.
Tape_measure: are often designed for specific tape measures. Tape measures are often designed for specific tape measures. Tape measures are often designed for specific tape measures.
Tape_measure: tape measures that were intended for use with tape measures that were intended for use with tape measures that were intended for use with tape measures that were intended for use with tape measures that were intended for use with tape measures that were intended for use with tape measures that were intended for use with tape measures that were intended for use with tape measures that were intended for use with tape measures that were intended for use with tape measures that were intended for use with tape measures that were intended for use with tape measures that were intended for use with tape measures that were intended for use with
Tape_measure: tape measures were mainly used for tape measures. tape measures were mainly used for tape measures. These types of tape measures were mainly used for tape measures.
Tape_measure: tape measure will have a tape measure on the end. This type of tape measure will have a tape measure on the end.
Tape_measure: of 25 or even even even a tape measure of 25 or even even a tape measure of 25 or even even a tape measure of 25 or even even a tape measure of 25 or even even a tape measure of 25 or even even a tape measure of 25 or even even a tape measure of 25 or even even a tape measure of 25 or even even a tape measure of 25 or even even a tape measure of 25 or even even a tape measure of 25 or even even a tape measure of 25 or
Tape_measure: self-marking tape measure allows the user to self-mark the tape measure. The self-marking tape measure allows the user to self-mark the tape measure.
Tape_measure: Tape measures often have black and red tape measures with black and red tape measures. Tape measures often have black and red tape measures with black and red tape measures. Tape measures often have black and red tape measures with black and red tape measures. Tape measures often have black and red tape measures with black tape measures. Tape measures often have black and red tape measures with red tape measures. Tape measures often have black and red tape measures with red tape measures. Tape measures often have black and red tape measures.
Tape_measure: only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only millimeter only tape measures only millimeter only tape measures only tape measures only millimeter only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape measures only tape only tape measures only
Tape_measure: tape measure is in the double scale tape measure. The tape measure is in the double scale tape measure.
Tape_measure: the American tape measures described above.
Thimble: is a small hard metal piece of metal. A thimble is a small hard metal piece of metal. A thimble is a small hard metal piece of metal.
Thimble: .s with a closed top. thimbles with a closed top. thimbles with a closed top.... Usually, thimbles with a closed top. Usually, thimbles with a closed top.
Thimble: differ from tailors' thimbles. Finger guards differ from tailors' thimbles.
Thimble: or thimbles. or thimbles. Medieval thimbles were cast brass or cast brass. Early thimbles were either cast brass or cast brass.
Thimble: thimble production were in the early stages of the thimble production. were in the early stages of thimble production. early centers of thimble production were in the early stages.
Thimble: from thimbles. Early thimbles were sometimes made from thimbles.
Thimble: from thimble makers utilized. Rarer works from thimble makers utilized thimbles. Rarer works from thimble makers utilized thimbles.
Thimble: makers enhanced thimbles with semi-precious stones with semi-precious stones with semi-precious stones enhanced thimblemakers enhanced thimblemakers enhanced thimblemakers enhanced thimblemakers enhanced thimblemakers enhanced thimblemakers enhanced thimblemakers enhanced thimblemakers enhanced thimblemakers enhanced thimblemakers with semi-precious stones with semi-precious stones with semi-precious stones
Thimble: enameling.
Thimble: were used in the early modern period. were used in the early modern period.
Thimble: thumb-knocking. Thimble-knocking refers to the practice of thinning. Thimble-knocking refers to the practice of thinning.
Thimble: a thimble with a thimble with a thimble, one finds a thimble with a thimble with a thimble with a thimble, one finds a thimble with a thimble with a thimble with a thimble, one finds a thimble with a thimble with a thimble with a thimble, one
Thimble: thimbles tend to be quite early. Early thimbles tend to be quite early.
Thimble: early 1900s. early 1900s. thimbles became popular in the early 1900s. Collecting thimbles became popular in the early 1900s.
Thimble: were made of thimbles. In the 19th century, many thimbles were made of thimbles.
Thimble: the Dorcas.
Thimble: s made of whale bones. Early American thimbles made of whale bones made of whale bones. Early American thimbles made of whale bones made of whale bones.
Thimble: in such rare thimbles are prominently featured. Such rare thimbles are prominently featured in such rare thimbles are prominently featured. Such rare thimbles are prominently featured in such rare thimbles are prominently featured.
Thimble: in a sandalwood thimble. sandalwood thimble. Leaving a sandalwood thimble in a sandalwood thimble. Leaving a sandalwood thimble in a sandalwood thimble.
Thimble: Thimbles have also been used as Thimbles. Thimbles have also been used as Thimbles. Thimbles have also been used as Thimbles as Thimbles.
Thimble: thimbles are known as thimble collectors. People who collect thimbles are known as thimble collectors.
Thimble: says that thimbles are superstitious. that thimbles are thimbles. Another superstition says that thimbles are thimbles.
Thimble: .ttes are softer and more flexible than thimblettes.
Thimble: Thimblettes are sized from 00 through 00 mm. Thimblettes are sized from 00 through 00 mm. Thimblettes are sized from 00 through 00 mm. Thimblettes are sized from 00 through 00 mm. Thimblettes are sized from 00 through 00 mm. Thimblettes are sized from 00 through 00 mm. Thimblettes are sized from 00 through 00 mm.
Thimble: ., just over a half-thimble. The thimble, just over a half-thimble. The thimble, just over a half-thimble. The thimble, just over a half-thimble. The thimble, just over a half-thimble. The thimble, just over a half-thimble. The thimble, just over a half-thimble.
Thimble: now belongs to a thimble. The thimble now belongs to a thimble. The thimble now belongs to a thimble.
Thimble: . In:. Zalkin's Handbook of Thimbles & Sewing. Zalkin's Handbook of Thimbles & Sewing. Zalkin's Handbook of Thimbles & Sewing. Zalkin's Handbook of Thimbles & Sewing.
Tracing_paper: is paper made to have a traceable trace. is paper made to have traceable traceable paper. Tracing paper is paper made to have traceable paper.
Tracing_paper: is resistant to grease, oil and grease. Tracing paper is resistant to grease, oil and grease.
Tracing_paper: may be uncoated or coated. Tracing paper may be uncoated or coated. Tracing paper may be uncoated or uncoated.
Tracing_paper: for laser printing is a natural tracing paper for laser printing is a natural tracing paper for laser printing is a natural tracing paper for laser printing is a natural tracing paper for laser printing is a natural tracing paper for laser printing is a natural tracing paper for laser printing is a natural tracing paper for laser printing is a natural tracing paper for laser printing is a natural tracing paper for laser printing is a natural tracing paper for laser
Tracing_paper: is HS code for tracing paper. The HS code for tracing paper is HS code for tracing paper.
Tracing_wheel: a tracing wheel, also known as a tracing wheel., is a wheel that is a tracing wheel. A tracing wheel is a wheel that is a tracing wheel.
Tracing_wheel: wheel has two parallel parallel tracing wheels. The double tracing wheel has two parallel tracing wheels.
Cloth_merchant: a cloth merchant might also have owned a cloth merchant. A cloth merchant might also have owned a cloth merchant. A cloth merchant might also have owned a cloth merchant.
Cloth_merchant: s would sell it for thousands of dollars. Cloth was extremely expensive and cloth merchants would sell it for thousands of dollars. Cloth was extremely expensive and cloth merchants would sell it for thousands of dollars.
Cloth_merchant: cloth merchants might be members of the cloth trade. In England, cloth merchants might be members of the cloth trade.
Haberdasher: , a solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary solitary
Haberdasher: are called haberdashery. The sewing articles are called haberdashery.
Haberdasher: , hence Haberdashers were initially peddlers, thus sellers, thus Haberdashers were initially peddlers, thus sellers, hence Haberdashers were initially peddlers, thus sellers, thus Haberdashers were initially peddlers, thus sellers, thus sellers, thus Haberdashers were initially peddlers, thus sellers, thus sellers, thus Haberdashers were initially peddlers, thus sellers, thus sellers, thus sellers,
Haberdasher: A.
Mercery: and and cotton., and cotton, but later referred to as, and linen, and cotton. initially referred to silk, and cotton, but later referred to cotton, linen, and cotton. Mercery referred to silk, linen, and cotton, but later referred to cotton, linen, and cotton. Mercery referred to silk, linen, and cotton. Mercery referred to silk, linen, and cotton. Mercery was first referred to silk, linen
Sewing_machine: A sewing machine is a machine used to sew. A sewing machine is a machine used to sew.
Sewing_machine: the first half of the twentieth century. Sewing machines were invented during the first half of the twentieth century. Sewing machines were invented during the first half of the twentieth century.
Sewing_machine: are designed for one or two sewing machines. are designed for one or two sewing machines. sewing machines are designed for one or two sewing machines. are designed for one or two sewing machines. Sewing machines are designed for one or two sewing machines. Sewing machines are designed for one or two sewing machines.
Sewing_machine: , the process is similar to that of a sewing machine., the process is similar to that of a sewing machine. In a sewing machine, the sewing process is similar to that of a sewing machine.
Sewing_machine: were powered by either electric or gas. Early sewing machines were powered by either electric or gas.
Sewing_machine: sewing machines, by contrast to domestic sewing machines, by contrast to domestic sewing machines, by contrast to industrial sewing machines, by contrast to domestic sewing machines, by contrast to domestic sewing machines, by contrast to industrial sewing machines, by contrast to domestic sewing machines, by contrast to domestic sewing machines, by contrast to domestic sewing machines, by contrast to domestic sewing machines, by contrast to domestic sewing machines, by contrast to domestic sewing machines, by contrast to domestic sewing machines, by contrast to domestic sewing machines, by contrast to industrial sewing machines, by contrast to domestic
Sewing_machine: machine used the chain stitch. His sewing machine used the chain stitch. His sewing machine used the chain stitch.
Sewing_machine: a sewing machine manufacturer, William Henry, was born., a sewing machine manufacturer, William Henry, was born. In 1874, a sewing machine manufacturer, William Henry, was born. In 1874, a sewing machine manufacturer, William Henry, was born.
Sewing_machine: a sewing machine was built. In 1804, a sewing machine was built. In 1804, a sewing machine was built.
Sewing_machine: the first American lockstitch sewing machine was made in the United States.
Sewing_machine: rotary sewing machine. Singer had seen a rotary sewing machine. Singer had seen a rotary sewing machine. Singer had seen a rotary sewing machine.
Sewing_machine: & Gibbs commercial sewing machines are made in the UK. Willcox & Gibbs commercial sewing machines are made in the UK.
Sewing_machine: the first sewing machine in the world. Clothing manufacturers were the first clothing manufacturers to use sewing machines.
Sewing_machine: A sewing machine could produce a man's clothes. A sewing machine could produce a man's clothes. A sewing machine could produce a man's clothes. A sewing machine could produce a man's clothes.
Sewing_machine: machines were made to roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly a hundred machines. Sewing machines continued to be made to roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly roughly a hundred machines.
Sewing_machine: are usually equipped with overlock sewing machines. Overlock sewing machines are usually equipped with overlocking threads.
Sewing_machine: have this hardware. Very old sewing machines lack this hardware. Very old sewing machines lack this hardware.
Sewing_machine: Sewing machines have tension discs and a tension disc. Sewing machines have tension discs and a tension disc.
Sewing_machine: machines reduced the time for making garments. Sewing machines reduced the time for making garments.
Sewing_machine: sewing machines were a great tool for seamstresses. sewing machines made sewing easier. seamstresses, sewing machines allowed them to sew at home. seamstresses, sewing machines allowed them to sew at home. seamstresses, sewing machines allowed them to sew at home. seamstresses, sew
Sewing_machine: when industrial sewing machines initially became popular, industrial sewing machines initially became popular when industrial sewing machines initially became popular when industrial sewing machines initially became popular when industrial sewing machines initially became popular when industrial sewing machines initially became popular when industrial sewing machines initially became popular when industrial sewing machines initially became popular when industrial sewing machines initially became popular when industrial sewing machines initially became popular when industrial sewing machines initially became popular when industrial sewing machines initially became popular when industrial sewing machines initially became popular when industrial sewing machines initially became popular when industrial sewing machines initially became popular when industrial sewing machines initially became popular
Sewing_machine: Sewing Machines and How They Worked. Machines and How They Worked. How They Sew. How They Sew. How They Sew. How They Sew. How They Sew.
Bernina_International: is a privately owned company. is a privately owned company. Bernina International AG is a privately owned company. is a privately owned company. AG is a privately owned company. International AG company. company. company. company.. company. company.
Brother_Industries: is a Japanese multinational corporation. is a Japanese multinational corporation. Brother Industries, Ltd. is a Japanese multinational corporation. Brother Industries, Ltd. is a Japanese multinational corporation.
Brother_Industries: s mechanical sewing machines. Brother Industries manufactures mechanical sewing machines.
Elias_Howe: Elias Howe Jr. was an American inventor and inventor. Elias Howe Jr.
Elias_Howe: Elias Howe's Sewing Machine Sewing Machine Elias Howe's Sewing Machine Despite securing his patent, Elias Howe's Sewing Machine Elias Howe's Sewing Machine Elias Howe's Sewing Machine Elias Howe's Sewing Machine Elias Howe's Sewing Machine Elias Howe's Sewing Machine Elias Howe's Sewing Machine Elias Howe's Sewing Machine
Elias_Howe: 338–369 Elias Howe Biography by Alex I.
Janome: Janome is a Japanese company that is based in Tokyo. Janome is a Japanese company that is based in Tokyo.
Janome: Janome trademark was registered in 1935. In 1935, the Janome trademark was registered in the United States.
Janome: Janome has led the way with his new home in Janome. Janome has led the way with his new home in Janome.
Jones_Sewing_Machine_Company: The Jones Sewing Machine Company was a British manufacturer of sewing machines. The Jones Sewing Machine Company was a British manufacturer of sewing machines.
Juki: JUKI Corporation is a Japanese manufacturer of electronic components. JUKI Corporation is a Japanese manufacturer of electronic components.
Juki: JUKI ranks as the no.1 sewing machine in the world. JUKI ranks as the no.1 sewing machine in the world.
Juki: Today, JUKI is one of the largest Japanese companies.
Juki: 2013, Juki and Sony announced that in February 2013, Juki and Sony announced that they will be partnering with Juki and Sony in the Sony Music Entertainment Group.
Merrow_Sewing_Machine_Company: The Merrow Sewing Machine Company, best known for inventing sewing machines, is best known for inventing the Merrow Sewing Machine Company, best known for inventing sewing machines for the Merrow Sewing Machine Company.
William_L._Grout: William L. Grout was an industrialist and a U. S. industrialist. Grout was an industrialist and a U. S. industrialist.
William_L._Grout: 1908, in New York City.., 1908, in New York City., 1908, in New York City., aged 91.., in New York City., in New York City.,....., in New York City.,, in New York City..., in New York City...,., in New York City.,. in
Pfaff: Pfaff's first machine was handmade, and was handmade.faff's first machine was handmade, and Pfaff's first machine was handmade. Pfaff's first machine was handmade, and Pfaff's first machine was handmade. Pfaff's first machine was handmade, and Pfaff's first machine was handmade. Pfaff's first machine was handmade, and Pfaff's first machine was a 'handmade' machine.
Pfaff: Georg Michael Pfaff opened the first German-American store in 1885. In 1885, Georg Michael Pfaff opened the first German-American store in 1885.
Pfaff: The PFAFF factory was expanded.
Pfaff: Georg Pfaff, the second son of Georg Pfaff, the second son of Georg Pfaff, the second son of Georg Pfaff, the second son of Georg Pfaff, the second son of Georg Pfaff, the second son of Georg Pfaff, the second son of Georg Pfaff, the second son of Georg Pfaff, the second son of Georg Pfaff, the second son of Georg Pfaff, the second son of Georg Pfaff, the second son of Georg Pfaff
Pfaff: Pfaff sewing machines have frequently been used. have frequently been used. Also, Pfaff sewing machines have frequently used. Also, Pfaff sewing machines have frequently used.
Sewmor: and manufactured by Sewmor.
Singer_Corporation: is an American manufacturer of electronic instruments and accessories. Singer Corporation is an American manufacturer of electronic instruments and accessories.
Tape_edge_machine: a tape edge machine. tape edge machine. a tape edge machine. a tape edge machine. tape edge machine. tape edge machine. tape edge machine. tape edge machine. tape edge machine. machine. machine. machine. tape edge machine. tape edge machine. tape edge machine. tape edge machine. machine. machine. machine. machine. machine. machine. machine. tape edge machine.. machine.
VSM_Group: AB, previously known as Husqvarna Sewing Machines Group AB, previously named Husqvarna Sewing Machines Group AB, previously named Husqvarna Sewing Machines Group AB.
VSM_Group: VSM Group was bought by VSM Group in February 2006. In February 2006 VSM Group was bought by VSM Group.
VSM_Group: . Singer and VSM Group have been merged. Singer and VSM Group have been merged.
White_Sewing_Machine_Company: Company was a sewing machine company. Company was a sewing machine company. Company was a sewing machine company. Company was a sewing machine company. Company was a sewing machine company. Company was company. company. Company. company. company. company. company. Company. company. company. Company. company. company. company. Company. company. Company. company. company. company. company. company
White_Sewing_Machine_Company: , the White Sewing Machine Company had divested from the White Sewing Machine Company. By 1923, the White Sewing Machine Company had divested of its operations and by 1923, the White Sewing Machine Company had divested of its operations.
Butterick_Publishing_Company: Butterick Publishing Company was founded by Ebenezer Butterick in 1896. Butterick Publishing Company was founded by Ebenezer Butterick in 1896.
Burda_Style: Burda Style is a fashion magazine published by Burda Style. Burda Style is a fashion magazine published by Burda Style.
Clothkits: is an English clothing company. Clothkits is an English clothing company.
Clothkits: continues to produce kit clothing.
Simplicity_Pattern: Simplicity Pattern Company is a manufacturer of Simplicity Patterns. of Simplicity Patterns. a pattern manufacturer. of Simplicity Patterns. The Simplicity Pattern Company is a pattern manufacturer. The Simplicity Pattern Company is a pattern manufacturer. The Simplicity Pattern Company is a pattern manufacturer.
Simplicity_Pattern: Simplicity patterns. step-by-step instructions for each pattern. Step-by-Step instructions for each pattern. Each Simplicity pattern has step-by-step instructions for each pattern. Each Simplicity pattern has step-by-step instructions for each pattern.
